










Blue Capital Management | Blue Capital



























Skip to main content









              Blue Capital Management Ltd.          






          Blue Capital Management Ltd.    







 






Blue Capital Management Ltd. ("Blue Capital") provides innovative catastrophe reinsurance-linked investment products for institutional and retail investors. Blue Capital is the wholly-owned asset management platform of Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd., a member of the Sompo International group of companies and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Sompo Holdings, Inc. Sompo International is a recognized global specialty provider of property and casualty insurance and reinsurance and a leader in property catastrophe and short tail reinsurance since 2001.
By leveraging Sompo International’s underwriting expertise and deep broker and client relationships, Blue Capital differentiates itself by providing investors broad access to the global catastrophe reinsurance market.
 





Asset Management
Alternative asset management focused exclusively on insurance-linked assets offering a range of risk opportunities with attractive investor returns.
 
 

Listed Vehicles
U.K. and U.S. publicly-listed vehicles invested in select catastrophe reinsurance risks which are largely uncorrelated to other asset classes.
Blue Capital Alternative Investment Fund Limited (LSE:BCAI) Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. (NYSE: BCRH)
 



Custom Products
Investment strategies in the global property catastrophe market can be customized to meet the objectives and risk tolerances of qualified institutional investors. Our products include Open Funds, Funds of One and Private Sidecars.
 

Collateralized Reinsurance
Fully collateralized reinsurance protection for the property catastrophe insurance and reinsurance markets is offered through Blue Water Re.
 
 


















Directors & Management | Blue Capital



























Skip to main content









              Blue Capital Management Ltd.          






          Blue Capital Management Ltd.    







 




Directors & Management



John Del Col Director
John V. Del Col serves as a Director of Blue Capital Management Ltd. and has been the General Counsel and Secretary of Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd., a wholly owned subsidiary of Sompo Holdings, Inc. Prior to joining Endurance in January 2003, Mr. Del Col was General Counsel and Deputy General Counsel for several property and casualty reinsurers and a merchant bank, having begun his career in associate roles at several New York law firms. He holds a JD from Harvard University and an AB from Dartmouth College. He is admitted to practice law in New York State.
 
Mike McGuire Director
Michael J. McGuire is the Director of Blue Capital Management Ltd. and Chairman of the Board for Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. He has served as Chief Financial Officer of Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd., a wholly owned subsidiary of Sompo Holdings, Inc., since January 2006. Prior to this role, he led Endurance’s external reporting, treasury and Sarbanes-Oxley compliance initiatives from 2003 through 2006. Mr. McGuire has a broad range of public accounting experience in audit and advisory roles in the United States, Bermuda and Europe, which included providing transaction accounting, structuring and due diligence services to private equity and strategic investors on mergers and acquisitions. Mr. McGuire is a Certified Public Accountant and a member of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants.
 
Carrie Rosorea Director
Carrie Rosorea serves as a Director of Blue Capital Management Ltd. and has served as Chief Accounting Officer of Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd., a wholly owned subsidiary of Sompo Holdings, Inc. since February 2013. Ms. Rosorea joined Endurance in 2005 and has held several financial reporting and controller positions of increasing responsibility, most recently Executive Vice President and Corporate Controller. From October 2000 to April 2005, Ms. Rosorea served as a Controller at Alta Partners, a San Francisco-based private equity firm. Previously, she worked as an Assistant Controller at XL Mid Ocean Reinsurance Company Ltd. and as a Senior Accountant in the audit practice of Deloitte & Touche LLP, both in the United States and Bermuda. Ms. Rosorea is a Certified Public Accountant.
 
Greg Garside Treasurer
Greg Garside is Treasurer of Blue Capital Management Ltd. and Chief Financial Officer of Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.  Greg also serves as Controller and Vice President of Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd., a wholly owned subsidiary of Sompo Holdings, Inc. Prior to joining Endurance, he served as Assistant Controller at LaSalle Re Ltd. and worked in the insurance audit practice at KPMG in Bermuda. Previously, Mr. Garside was a trainee accountant at Moore Stephens Chartered Accountants in London. Mr. Garside is a member of the Institute of Chartered Accountants in England and Wales.
 
William Haddrell Portfolio Manager
William Haddrell is the Portfolio Manager, responsible for risk origination, underwriting and trading, and has worked at Blue Capital since December 2013. Prior to his current role, he worked for Hardy Bermuda within the property treaty team as an underwriter with a focus on the USA and Japan. Prior to Hardy Bermuda William Haddrell worked as an underwriter in the direct and facultative team at Renaissance Re’s Syndicate 1458 at Lloyd’s of London from 2010-2013 and as an underwriting analyst for Renaissance Re Bermuda from 2008-2010.
 
Allison Kiene
SVP, Assistant General Counsel & Chief Compliance Officer
Allison Kiene is Secretary and Chief Compliance Officer of Blue Capital Management Ltd. She is also Senior Vice President and Assistant General Counsel for Endurance Services. Ms. Kiene joined Montpelier Re Holdings Ltd. (acquired by Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd. in July 2015) in October 2007. Prior to joining Montpelier, Ms. Kiene served as Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary for Familymeds Group Inc. Ms. Kiene is admitted to the Bar in Connecticut, Massachusetts and New York.
 


















Print Page

 | 







Email Page

 | 







Subscribe to Monthly Facts




















Contacts | Blue Capital



























Skip to main content









              Blue Capital Management Ltd.          






          Blue Capital Management Ltd.    







 




Contacts





 
IR Contact
Investor RelationsT: +1 441 278 0988E: investorrelations@sompo-intl.com


 
Street Address
Blue Capital Management Ltd.
100 Pitts Bay Road
Pembroke, HM 08
Bermuda  
Mailing Address
Suite No. 784
48 Par-la-ville Road
Hamilton HM 11
Registered in Bermuda No. 38829
T: +1 441 278 0400F: +1 441 296 0401E: info@bluecapital.bmWebsite: www.bluecapital.bm


 


 


















Print Page

 | 







Email Page

 | 







Subscribe to Monthly Facts




















Products | Blue Capital



























Skip to main content









              Blue Capital Management Ltd.          






          Blue Capital Management Ltd.    







 




Products



Open Ended Funds
Subscribe to Monthly Open Ended Fund Fact Sheets
Blue Capital has two open ended funds which allow for monthly subscriptions and quarterly redemptions of NAV. Blue Capital Management Ltd. (“Blue Capital”) is the wholly-owned asset management platform of Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd., a member of the Sompo International group of companies and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Sompo Holdings, Inc. Blue Capital is the investment manager for both Funds. Sompo International is a recognized global specialty provider of property and casualty insurance and reinsurance and a leader in property catastrophe and short tail reinsurance since 2001.
Blue Capital Mid Vol Fund (“BCMV”) launched in June 2012 and focuses solely on the traditional reinsurance market through a three pillar approach to investing. Each investment made by the Fund is allocated to one of three pillars; “Mid Market”, “Top Layer”, and “Select” catastrophe contracts. Its core investment strategy is predicated upon flexible and opportunistic execution within the Insurance Linked Securities market. The Fund looks to assemble a complementary portfolio of risks across various segments within the reinsurance asset class, by differentiating relative across the industry’s capital structure, and the various points across the reinsurance market pricing cycle.
Blue Capital Low Vol Fund (“BCLV”) launched in February 2014 and invests in Insurance-Linked Securities offering some of the lowest risk levels available in the reinsurance market (as measured by modeled expected loss per security). Where an insurance company purchases a tower of reinsurance protection split across a number of risk tranches, Insurance-Linked Securities eligible for inclusion in the Fund will be those linked to the performance of the most senior reinsurance tranches hedged by the insurer. In this way, for an Insurance-Linked Security included in the Fund to suffer a loss all participating reinsurers and investors on layers junior to such investment must have experienced a total loss of principal.
Listed Vehicles
Blue Capital Alternative Investment Fund Limited & Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.
Our U.K. and U.S. publicly-listed vehicles provide qualified institutional and retail investors the opportunity to invest in a portfolio of select catastrophe reinsurance risks which are largely uncorrelated to other asset classes.
By leveraging the Sompo International platform, Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. (NYSE: BCRH) and Blue Capital Alternative Investment Fund Limited (LSE: BCAI) are able to invest broadly across the global catastrophe reinsurance market.
Funds of One
Customized Investment Portfolios
Blue Capital Management Ltd. offers customized investment portfolios to qualified institutional investors via a “fund of one” segregated account at the Master Fund. The investment guidelines are customized to meet the investor’s objectives and risk tolerance. The portfolio is invested via Blue Water Re and, in all other respects, is managed in the same way as the closed- and open-ended funds.
Private Sidecars
Blue Capital is able to provide turnkey solutions for qualified investors interested in participating in the global property catastrophe reinsurance market through a customized quota share with Sompo International, a leading global specialty insurer and reinsurer.
 


















Print Page

 | 







Email Page

 | 







Subscribe to Monthly Facts




















Legal Information | Blue Capital



























Skip to main content









              Blue Capital Management Ltd.          






          Blue Capital Management Ltd.    







 




Legal Information



Terms and Conditions of www.bluecapital.bm and email communications with Blue Capital (collectively, the "Site")
You should read these Terms and Conditions carefully before using the Site.  By accessing or using this Site, you agree to be bound by these Terms and Conditions.  No proposed variation, amendment or changes to these Terms and Conditions are valid or have any effect. If you do not agree with or accept any of these Terms and Conditions, you are not authorized to use the Site and your sole remedy is to cease using the Site immediately.
1. Regulatory Issues
The Site is made available to you by Blue Capital Management Ltd. ("Blue Capital") for information purposes only. Blue Capital is the wholly-owned asset management platform of Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd., a member of the Sompo International group of companies and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Sompo Holdings, Inc. Sompo International is a recognized global specialty provider of property and casualty insurance and reinsurance and a leader in property catastrophe and short tail reinsurance since 2001.
This Site and the information contained herein does not and is not intended to constitute a solicitation of interest in respect of the acquisition of any shares or securities or the provision of investment management, advisory or other services to any person in any jurisdiction in which such solicitation is not authorized or to any person to whom it would be unlawful to make such a solicitation.
You are required to notify Blue Capital immediately by email if any information which you are able to access on this Site would cause you or Blue Capital to be in breach of applicable laws or regulations.  In such event, you shall
destroy immediately any such information (and all copies) which has been downloaded or printed by you from this Site;
stop accessing this Site;
disregard such information; and
treat such information as confidential and not disseminate it.
The content of this Site is general in nature.  This Site is not intended to provide specific investment advice including, without limitation, investment, financial, legal, accounting or tax advice, or to make any recommendations about the suitability of any securities or investment strategies discussed on this Site for the circumstances of any particular investor.  If you do require investment advice, please contact an independent broker or financial adviser.  You should take appropriate advice as to any securities, taxation or other legislation affecting you personally prior to investing.  Terms are indicative only and subject to change.  The services described on this Site are not necessarily available to all persons, or to residents of all jurisdictions.  The opinions or recommendations expressed on this Site do not take into account individual circumstances and are not intended to represent "recommendations" by Blue Capital to particular clients.  Past performance is not necessarily indicative of future results, and nothing on this Site should be interpreted to state or imply otherwise.  The value of an investment and the income from it can go up as well as down, it may be affected by exchange rate variations and you may not get back any amount invested.
If you are in any doubt about any of the information on this Site, please consult your financial or other professional adviser.
2. Availability
While Blue Capital makes every effort to ensure that the Site is available, Blue Capital does not represent, warrant or guarantee in any way that there is continued availability at all times or of uninterrupted use by you of the Site.  Your use of this Site is at the sole discretion of Blue Capital. Blue Capital may deny you access to the Site or any portion thereof at any time, without notice and with or without cause. Further, Blue Capital reserves the right to suspend or cease the operation of the Site from time to time at its sole discretion.
3. Proper Conduct
You warrant that when using the Site you shall not:
resell or transfer any Content (as defined in Section 4 below) of the Site;
impersonate, or otherwise misrepresent your affiliation with any other person or entity;
modify, falsify, or delete any attributions, legends, marks, notices, or any other proprietary designation of the origin or source of any material (including Content) appearing on the Site;
copy, transmit, reproduce, modify, create derivative works of, distribute or in any way exploit any information, content, component or other material obtained through the Site (other than as expressly permitted by these Terms and Conditions);
violate, attempt to violate or assist, intentionally, negligently or otherwise, in any violation of the confidentiality or security of any information provided to Blue Capital by other Site users;
use any robot, spider, or other automatic device, or manual process to monitor or copy the Site pages or the contents contained therein without the prior, expressed written permission of Blue Capital; or
violate or facilitate any violation of any applicable local, state, federal, or international law, statute, regulation, code, or ordinance, including, without limitation, regulations promulgated by or the rules of any national or other securities exchange.
The permission to use the Site granted by your agreement to adhere to these Terms and Conditions and automatically terminates if you breach any of the Terms and Conditions contained herein.  Upon termination, you must immediately destroy any downloaded or printed materials.  As described in Section 4 below, any unauthorized use of any Content contained in this Site may violate copyright laws, trademark laws, the laws of privacy and publicity, and communications statutes and regulations.
Blue Capital reserves its right to prevent you from accessing the Site if you do not comply with any part of these Terms and Conditions.
4. Intellectual Property Rights
All images, text, programs, and other materials and content (collectively, the "Content") provided on this Site is protected by law, including copyright law, intellectual property rights laws and international treaties. Any intellectual property rights subsisting in the Content on the Site belongs to Blue Capital and/or its licensors.  All rights are reserved for the benefit of Blue Capital and/or its licensors.  Nothing in these Terms and Conditions grants you any rights in the Site or the Content contained therein.
You are granted permission to display, copy, distribute and download the Content on this Site for personal, non-commercial use only, provided you: (i) keep intact all copyright and other proprietary notices; (ii) make no modifications to the Content on this Site; (iii) do not use the Content on this Site in a manner that suggests an association with any products, services, or brands; and (iv) do not download the Content to a database that can be used to avoid future downloads from the Site. Except as stated herein, none of the Content may be copied, reproduced, republished, downloaded, displayed, modified, transmitted, licensed, transferred, sold or distributed by any means or otherwise exploited in any manner, including but not limited to electronic, mechanical, photocopying, recording or otherwise, without the express prior written permission of Blue Capital or it is clearly indicated that any document or information may be downloaded and used.
The names, logos, taglines and other marks identifying Blue Capital and its products and services are proprietary marks of Blue Capital. Any other trademarks and service marks are the property of their respective owners. This Terms and Conditions does not grant you the right to use any trademark, service mark or logo appearing on the Site for any purpose whatsoever.
5. Content
As described in Section 6 below (Disclaimers), whilst Blue Capital endeavors to ensure that the information posted on the Site is accurate, Blue Capital does not represent, warrant or promise (whether express or implied) that any information is or remains accurate, complete and up-to-date, or fit or suitable for any purpose.
6. Disclaimers
YOU AGREE THAT ANY USE OF THE SITE IS AT YOUR SOLE RISK AND THAT THE SITE IS PROVIDED ON AN "AS IS" AND "AS AVAILABLE" BASIS WITHOUT WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EITHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED. ALL INFORMATION CONTAINED ON OR WHICH MAY BE TRANSMITTED THROUGH THIS SITE OR IN CONNECTION WITH BLUE CAPITAL'S        EMAIL ALERTS IS PROVIDED WITHOUT GUARANTEES OF COMPLETENESS, ACCURACY OR TIMELINESS AND WITHOUT WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED. BLUE CAPITAL DOES NOT WARRANT THAT THIS SITE, ITS EMAIL ALERT SERVICES, OR ANY OTHER WEB SITES THAT MAY BE LINKED TO THROUGH THIS SITE, WILL BE UNINTERRUPTED, ERROR FREE, FREE OF VIRUSES, DEFECTS OR HARMFUL COMPONENTS, COMPATIBLE WITH YOUR COMPUTER EQUIPMENT OR FIT FOR ANY PURPOSE.
TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, BLUE CAPITAL DISCLAIMS ALL REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO: (A) ANY WARRANTY FOR CONTENT, INFORMATION, DATA, SERVICES, UNINTERRUPTED ACCESS, OR PRODUCTS PROVIDED THROUGH OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SITE; (B) ANY WARRANTIES CONCERNING THE AVAILABILITY, ACCURACY, USEFULNESS, OR CONTENT OF INFORMATION, OR SERVICES OFFERED ON OR THROUGH THE SITE; (C) ANY WARRANTIES THAT THE SITE IS FREE OF VIRUSES, WORMS, TROJAN HORSES OR OTHER HARMFUL COMPONENTS; AND (D) ANY WARRANTIES OF TITLE OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, OR WARRANTIES OF NON-INFRINGEMENT.
7. Limitation of Liability
If you are accessing the Site from outside Bermuda, you are responsible for ensuring that your use of the Site is in accordance with the laws of the country of your residence or the jurisdiction from which you are accessing the Site. Blue Capital disclaims and excludes all liability howsoever arising and of whatsoever nature to you in the event that your use of the Site is contrary to the laws of the country of your residence or from which you are accessing the Site.
UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO NEGLIGENCE, SHALL BLUE CAPITAL BE LIABLE FOR ANY DAMAGES, DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, AND/OR CONSEQUENTIAL, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION BODILY INJURY, EMOTIONAL DISTRESS OR DISCOMFORT, OR PHYSICAL DAMAGE RESULTING FROM OR IN ANY WAY RELATED TO YOUR USE OF THE SITE, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO:
YOUR USE, REFERENCE TO OR RELIANCE ON ANY INFORMATION OBTAINED ON OR THROUGH THIS SITE OR PROVIDED IN CONNECTION WITH BLUE CAPITAL'S EMAIL ALERTS;
ANY ERROR OR INACCURACIES IN ANY INFORMATION OR MATERIAL WITHIN OR RELATING TO THE SITE OR PROVIDED IN CONNECTION WITH BLUE CAPITAL'S EMAIL ALERTS;
THE UNAVAILABILITY OF THE SITE FOR WHATSOEVER REASON, OR ANY REPRESENTATION OR STATEMENT MADE ON THE SITE OR IN CONNECTION WITH BLUE CAPITAL'S EMAIL ALERTS; OR
ANY STATEMENT OR REPRESENTATION MADE ON THE SITE OR IN CONNECTION WITH BLUE CAPITAL'S EMAIL ALERTS.
For the avoidance of doubt, Blue Capital does not exclude or limit its liability for death or personal injury arising from its negligence, for any fraudulent misrepresentation made by Blue Capital on the Site or for any other statutory rights that are not capable of being excluded.
8. Hyperlinks and Third Party Sites
This Site may contain hyperlinks to web sites owned and operated by parties other than Blue Capital.  Such hyperlinks are provided only for your convenience.  Blue Capital does not control such third party web sites and is not responsible for their contents.  The inclusion of hyperlinks on the Site does not mean that Blue Capital endorses or approves of any third party web site to which you may have access through the linked web sites.  Blue Capital does not guarantee the sequence, accuracy, or completeness of any information or data displayed through such sites. Blue Capital accepts no liability for any information, products or services contained in, or which may be linked to through, these third party web sites or for any action you may take as a result of linking to any such web site. Each of the web sites to which you may link are likely to set forth specific Terms and Conditions of use that you should review.
9. Forward-Looking Statements
Certain materials on this Site may contain statements, beliefs and opinions which are forward-looking and reflect current expectations and projections about future events as of the date of the materials.  By their nature, forward-looking statements involve a number of risks, uncertainties and assumptions that could cause actual results or events to differ materially from those expressed or implied by forward-looking statements which could adversely affect the outcome and financial effects of the plans and events described.  Forward looking statements contained in this Site regarding past trends or activities should not be taken as a representation that such trends or activities will continue in the future.  Users are cautioned not to put undue reliance on these forward-looking statements.  Forward-looking statements speak only as of the date they are made, and Blue Capital assumes no obligation to update or revise any of them in light of new information, future events or otherwise.
10. Indemnity
You agree to indemnify, defend and hold harmless Blue Capital, its directors, officers, employees, agents, licensors, attorneys, independent contractors, providers, subsidiaries and affiliates (collectively, the "Blue Capital Indemnitees") from and against any and all claim, loss, expense, or demand or liability, including attorneys' fees and costs, incurred by the Blue Capital Indemnitees arising out of:
any claim by a third party relating to the posting, distribution, modification or alteration by you of any content; or
you use of the Site in violation of these Terms and Conditions or in violation of any applicable law.
You agree to cooperate with us as reasonably required in the defense of any such claims. The Blue Capital Indemnitees reserve the right, at their own expense, to assume the exclusive defense and control of any matter otherwise subject to indemnification by you, and you shall not in any event settle any such claim or matter without the written consent of Blue Capital.
11. Security
Blue Capital takes appropriate technical and organizational measures against unauthorized or unlawful processing of personal data and against accidental loss or destruction of, or damage to, personal data.  However, although Blue Capital takes appropriate measures to protect the security of the information communicated through the Site, the Internet is an open network that is not secure and there is an inherent risk that any transmission via the Internet may be intercepted, modified, misdirected, or not be delivered to the intended recipient.  In addition, there is also an inherent risk that information stored on a computer connected to the Internet may be accessed without authorization. As no Internet-connected computer system can be made absolutely secure from intrusion, Blue Capital cannot and does not guarantee that information displayed on the Site has not been modified by others without authorization or that information communicated by you to us will be received or that it will not be altered before or after its transmission to us. If you elect to use this Site to communicate with us, you do so at your own risk.
12. Privacy Statement
As described herein, Blue Capital operates this Site for the purpose of providing information concerning its reinsurance business.  Blue Capital is committed to respecting your privacy and that of the information you provide to us in connection with using this Site.  By using this Site, you consent to the processing of personal information about you as described in this Privacy Statement for this Site.
The information that Blue Capital collects consists of voluntarily submitted personal information. For example, if you choose to subscribe to Blue Capital's e-mail alert service, you will be required to submit your email address to enable us to provide you with the requested services. Also, if you submit an information request through the Site, you will be required to provide us with personal information, such as your name, company name, e-mail address, physical address, fax number and demographic information (such as, city, state and country, or any other demographic information that you may submit) so that we can contact you and respond to your inquiry. The personal information we collect through the Site is collected and stored in a manner appropriate to the nature of your request, as determined by Blue Capital.
All information you provide through the Site is used to provide and improve the services offered by Blue Capital. This information may also be provided to or shared with affiliates of Blue Capital or its associated co-insurers. Except as provided herein, Blue Capital will not share your personal information with any third party without your prior consent. Blue Capital does not currently sell, trade or rent personal information to any third-party without your prior consent.
13. Remedies for Misuse
You agree that any unauthorized use of the Site or its Contents may cause Blue Capital immediate and irreparable harm for which money damages may not constitute an adequate remedy.  You further agree that injunctive relief, in addition to any other remedies available, may be warranted in order to enforce these Terms and Conditions. You further understand that unauthorized use of the Site may expose you to civil and criminal liability and that Blue Capital may report violations of these Terms and Conditions to and cooperate fully with the appropriate law enforcement authorities concerning any violations hereof.
IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER REMEDY AVAILABLE, YOU AGREE AND ACKNOWLEDGE THAT IN THE EVENT THAT YOU WILFULLY BREACH ANY OF THESE TERMS, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO AMENDING OR MODIFYING THE CONTENT OR COPYING, MODIFYING, DOWNLOADING OR REPRODUCING ANY PORTION OF THE SITE OR CONTENT, THEN YOU SHALL BE LIABLE TO BLUE CAPITAL FOR LIQUIDATED DAMAGES IN THE AMOUNT OF $5,000 PER VIOLATION. IN NO EVENT SHALL LIABILITY FOR LIQUIDATED DAMAGES PRECLUDE LIABILITY FOR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES OR ANY OTHER REMEDY.
14. General
Blue Capital reserves the right to vary these Terms and Conditions from time to time without notifying you.  By continuing to use and access the Site you agree to be bound by any variation made by Blue Capital.  It is your responsibility to check these Terms and Conditions from time to time to verify such variations.
These Terms and Conditions contains the entire understanding and agreement between Blue Capital and you in relation to your use of the Site and supersede and replace any representation, statement or other communication (whether written or otherwise) made by you or Blue Capital which is not contained herein.
Should any part of these Terms and Conditions for any reason be declared invalid or unenforceable by a court of a competent jurisdiction, it shall be deemed to be deleted without affecting the remaining provisions.
15. Applicable Laws
These Terms and Conditions are governed and construed in accordance with the laws of Bermuda.  You hereby consent to the exclusive jurisdiction of the Bermuda courts in all disputes arising out of or relating to the use of this Site. Use of this Site is unauthorised in any jurisdiction that does not give effect to all provisions of these Terms and Conditions, including without limitation this paragraph.
YOU AND BLUE CAPITAL WAIVE TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW ANY RIGHT TO A TRIAL BY JURY WITH RESPECT TO ANY DISPUTE, CONTROVERSY OR CLAIM ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THESE TERMS OF USE.
The captions used in these Terms and Conditions appear solely for convenience and such captions do not constitute any part of the Terms and Conditions.  Any rights not expressly granted herein are reserved by Blue Capital.
If you have any questions about these Terms and Conditions, the operation of this Site, or your dealings with us, you can contact us at:
BLUE CAPITAL MANAGEMENT LTD.
100 Pitts Bay Road
Pembroke, Bermuda , HM08
PO Box HM 2079
Hamilton, Bermuda, HMHX
T: +1 441.278.0400F: +1 441.278.0401E: info@bluecapital.bm
 


















Print Page

 | 







Email Page

 | 







Subscribe to Monthly Facts









Blue Capital Alternative Income Fund Limited | Investor Center | Blue Capital Alternative Income Fund Limited


                    BLUE CAPITAL ALTERNATIVE INCOME FUND LIMITED
              
            BLUE CAPITAL ALTERNATIVE INCOME FUND LIMITED
          Blue Capital Alternative Income Fund LimitedBlue Capital Alternative Income Fund Limited is a London-listed closed-end fund (LSE:BCAI) launched in 2012. The fund provides qualified institutional and retail investors with the opportunity to access the global catastrophe reinsurance market, and to invest in an alternative asset class whose historical returns have been largely uncorrelated to those of other asset classes including global equities, bonds and hedge funds.Fund Summary Listing:  London Stock Exchange: Specialist Fund Segment
        Bermuda Stock Exchange  Domicile:  Bermuda  Launch Date:  December 2012  Structure:  Closed-ended Fund  NAV per Ordinary Share  $1.1065 (April 2017)  Net Assets  $197.7 Million (April 2017)  Frequency of Dividends:  Paid Quarterly (Feb., May, Aug. and Nov.)  Ordinary Share Information  ISIN: BMG1189R1043
        SEDOL: B7TT4M6
                    TICKERS:
                
                    London Stock Exchange (BCAI.L)Bermuda Stock Exchange (BCAI.BH)
                Stock Quote
BCAI.L (Common Stock)
			  $1.050.00 (0.00%)ExchangeLSEVolume177,500Today's Open$1.05Previous Close$1.05Data as of 07/26/17 4:44 p.m. ETRefresh quoteLatest Regulatory News26 July 2017Blue Capital - Blue Capital Alternative Income Fund TR-126 July 2017Blue Capital - Partial Redemption Announcement26 July 2017Blue Capital - Transaction in Own Shares25 July 2017Blue Capital - TRANSACTION IN OWN SHARESOrdinary Share NAV Total Return (Inclusive of Dividends Paid)JanFebMarAprMayJunJulAugSepOctNovDecFull Yr2017
                    0.7%
                
                    0.2%
                
                    0.1%
                
                    0.2%
                0.2%0.5%
                    1.8%
                2016
                    0.4%
                
                    0.3%
                
                    0.3%
                
                    0.2%
                
                    -1.8%
                
                    0.5%
                
                    1.1%
                
                    2.5%
                
                    2.8%
                
                    -0.2%
                
                    1.0%
                
                    0.9%
                
                    8.3%
                2015
                    0.3%
                
                    0.3%
                
                    0.3%
                
                    0.2%
                
                    0.2%
                
                    0.7%
                
                    0.7%
                
                    2.0%
                
                    2.0%
                
                    1.6%
                
                    0.5%
                
                    0.6%
                
                    9.6%
                2014
                    0.2%
                
                    0.3%
                
                    0.0%
                
                    -0.1%
                
                    0.3%
                
                    0.4%
                
                    1.3%
                
                    1.9%
                
                    2.4%
                
                    1.1%
                
                    0.3%
                
                    0.5%
                
                    8.8%
                2013
                    0.3%
                
                    0.4%
                
                    0.5%
                
                    0.7%
                
                    0.1%
                
                    0.8%
                
                    1.0%
                
                    2.4%
                
                    3.2%
                
                    1.9%
                
                    0.1%
                
                    0.0%
                
                    11.8%
                Upcoming EventsThere are currently no events scheduled.Receive Email AlertsSign up to receive email alerts whenever Blue Capital Alternative Income Fund Limited posts new information to the site. Just enter your email address and click Submit.







                     Data provided by Nasdaq.  Minimum 15 minutes delayed. Print Page |  Email Page |  Email AlertsIMPORTANT DISCLAIMER AND TERMS OF USEELECTRONIC VERSIONS OF THE MATERIALS RELATING TO BLUE CAPITAL ALTERNATIVE INCOME FUND LIMITED (THE "COMPANY") YOU ARE SEEKING TO ACCESS ARE BEING MADE AVAILABLE ON THIS WEBSITE IN GOOD FAITH AND ARE FOR INFORMATION PURPOSES ONLY.
      THESE MATERIALS ARE NOT, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, DIRECTED AT OR ACCESSIBLE BY PERSONS IN THE UNITED STATES OR PERSONS RESIDENT OR LOCATED IN THE UNITED STATES, AUSTRALIA, CANADA, THE REPUBLIC OF SOUTH AFRICA, JAPAN, ANY MEMBER STATE OF THE EUROPEAN ECONOMIC AREA ("EEA") (OTHER THAN THE UNITED KINGDOM AND ANY SUCH OTHER MEMBER STATES WHERE MARKETING IS PERMITTED PURSUANT TO THE ALTERNATIVE INVESTMENT FUND MANAGERS DIRECTIVE (61/2011/EU) (TOGETHER, "ELIGIBLE MEMBER STATES")) OR ANY OTHER JURISDICTION WHERE THE EXTENSION OF AVAILABILITY OF SUCH MATERIALS WOULD BREACH ANY APPLICABLE LAW OR REGULATION.
      By accessing this website you are representing to the Company and its advisers that you are not: (i) a US Person (within the meaning of Regulation S under the Securities Act of 1933 (as amended, the "Securities Act") (a "US Person")) and are not acting on behalf of a US Person, nor purchasing with a view to re-sale in the US or to or for the account of a US Person, and that you are not an employee benefit plan as defined in section 3(3) of the United States Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 and the regulations promulgated thereunder (in each case as amended) ("ERISA") (whether or not subject to the provisions of Title 1 of ERISA) or similar US laws or an individual retirement account as defined in section 408 of the US Internal Revenue Code; (ii) a resident of Australia, Canada, Japan, the Republic of South Africa or a jurisdiction where the extension of availability of the materials to which you are seeking access would breach any applicable law or regulation; and that you will not: (x) offer, sell, renounce, transfer or deliver, directly or indirectly, Shares subscribed for by you in the United States, Australia, Canada, Japan, the Republic of South Africa or in any jurisdiction in which such offers or sales are unlawful ("Excluded Territories") or to any US Person or resident of Australia, Canada, Japan, the Republic of South Africa or any Excluded Territories, or: (y) release or otherwise forward, distribute or send any materials on this website in or into the United States, Australia, Canada, Japan, the Republic of South Africa or any Excluded Territories.
      Shares ("Shares") in the capital of the Company have not been and will not be registered under the Securities Act, or with any securities regulatory authority of any state or other jurisdiction of the United States and, subject to certain exceptions, Shares may not be offered, sold, resold, pledged, delivered, distributed or otherwise transferred, directly or indirectly, into or within the United States, or to, or for the account or benefit of, US Persons.  The Company has not been and will not be registered under the United States Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, (the "Investment Company Act") and, as such, investors will not be entitled to the benefits of the Investment Company Act.  A US Person that acquires Shares may be required to sell or transfer such Shares to a person qualified to hold Shares or forfeit the Shares if the transfer is not made in a timely manner.
      Any person outside the United Kingdom wishing to acquire, subscribe for or purchase any Shares  should satisfy himself that, in doing so, he complies with the laws of any relevant territory, and that he obtains any requisite governmental or other consents and observes any other applicable formalities.
      In addition, relevant clearances have not been, and will not be, obtained from the securities commission (or equivalent) of any province of Australia, Canada, Japan, the Republic of South Africa or any other Excluded Territory and, accordingly, unless an exemption under any relevant legislation or regulations is applicable, none of the Shares may be offered, sold, renounced, transferred or delivered, directly or indirectly, in Australia, Canada, Japan, the Republic of South Africa or any other Excluded Territory.
      These materials are only addressed to and directed at persons in Eligible Member States who are "qualified investors" within the meaning of Article 2(1)(e) of the Prospectus Directive (Directive 2003/71/EC (and amendments thereto, including Directive 2010/73/EU, to the extent implemented in the Relevant Member State)) ("Qualified Investors").  If you are located in the EEA but outside the UK, by accessing this website, you warrant, represent, acknowledge and agree that: (i) you are a Qualified Investor; (ii) you are a recipient in an Eligible Member State; and (iii) you have read, agree to and will comply with the contents of this notice.
      Access to electronic versions of these materials is being made available on the webpage in good faith and for information purposes only.  Making press announcements and other documents relating to any offering of securities available in electronic format does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy or subscribe for securities, nor does it constitute a recommendation by any party to sell or buy securities. 
      The contents of this website are not a financial promotion and none of the contents of this website constitute an invitation or inducement to engage in investment activity.  If and to the extent that this website or any of its contents are deemed to be a financial promotion, the Company is relying on the exemption provided by Article 69 of the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000 (Financial Promotions) Order 2005/1529 in respect of section 21 of the Financial Services and Markets Act 2000.  In particular, any information in respect of past performance (including without limitation past performance of the Company, the Shares and/or the Company's portfolio) cannot be relied upon as a guide to future performance.
      Any person accessing the website should carefully review the Terms of Use of the website. By using the website, you indicate that you accept the Terms of Use and that you agree to abide by them. If you do not agree to the Terms of Use, please refrain from using the website.
      By clicking on the "Accept" button/checking the box below, I confirm, represent, warrant and agree that:I am not a US Person or located in the United States, Australia, Canada, Japan or the Republic of South Africa or any other Excluded Territory, and I confirm that I am permitted to view electronic versions of these materials;I will not forward, transmit or show the materials contained in this webpage to any US Person or person located in, or a resident of, the United States, Australia, Canada, Japan or the Republic of South Africa or any other Excluded Territory; I am not investing or otherwise acting for the account or benefit of a us person or a resident of Australia, Canada, Japan, the Republic of South Africa or any Excluded Territory; andI have read and understood the disclaimer set out above and will read carefully any additional disclaimers or important notices attaching to or forming part of the materials or information on this website. I understand that this may affect my rights, and I agree to be bound by their terms.AcceptDecline

BCRH Stock Price - Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Stock Quote (U.S.: NYSE) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,711.01


97.58


0.45%











S&P 500

2,477.83


0.70


0.03%











Nasdaq

6,422.75


10.57


0.16%











GlobalDow

2,863.49


13.96


0.49%











Gold

1,269.60


14.00


1.12%











Oil

48.66


-0.09


-0.18%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



BA 
9.9




T 
5.0




AMD 
4.6




BIIB 
4.5






AKAM
-14.6




UHS
-8.2




RHI
-7.4




JNPR
-6.3














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








10:44p

Updated
Americans in this field have the highest rate of divorce by age 30



10:43p

Updated
These cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings



9:55p

Updated
This social network ranks as the worst for young people’s mental health (it’s not Facebook)



9:55p

Updated
Move over, breathalyzers; ‘textalyzers’ could be used on drivers’ phones 



9:54p

Updated
This is the worst mistake people make at work



9:54p

Updated
Cities to move to if you want to work in tech — NOT including San Francisco



9:54p

Updated
What Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss



9:49p

Updated
Watch out for these surprise charges at the ER



9:49p

Updated
The open road or the open skies? Millennials choose the former...



9:47p

Updated
How an online wedding registry in my name appeared out of thin air












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


BCRH


Overview



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors
NYSE

 



BCRH
U.S.: NYSE


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.

Watchlist 
CreateBCRHAlert



  


After Hours

Last Updated: Jul 26, 2017 4:39 p.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
19.00



0.00
0.00%



After Hours Volume:
108





Close
Chg
Chg %




$19.00
-0.20
-1.04%





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




89.01% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    17.2K
                


                65 Day Avg. - 19.4K
            





Open: 19.15
Close: 19.00



19.0000
Day Low/High
19.5000





Day Range



17.2200
52 Week Low/High
20.8337


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$19.15



Day Range
19.0000 - 19.5000



52 Week Range
17.2200 - 20.8337



Market Cap
n/a



Shares Outstanding
8.75M



Public Float
6.25M



Beta
0.30



Rev. per Employee
n/a



P/E Ratio
n/a



EPS
n/a



Yield
6.32%



Dividend
$0.30



Ex-Dividend Date
Jun 28, 2017



Short Interest
45.69K
07/14/17


% of Float Shorted
0.73%



Average Volume
19.36K




 


Performance




5 Day


-1.55%







1 Month


2.98%







3 Month


-4.52%







YTD


2.98%







1 Year


5.91%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones










Blue Capital Reinsurance downgraded to sell from buy at UBS


Nov. 23, 2016 at 10:17 a.m. ET
by Tomi Kilgore









Blue Capital Reinsurance downgraded to market perform from outperform at Raymond James


Oct. 19, 2016 at 8:12 a.m. ET
by Tomi Kilgore







No Headlines Available











Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






10-Q: BLUE CAPITAL REINSURANCE HOLDINGS LTD.
10-Q: BLUE CAPITAL REINSURANCE HOLDINGS LTD.

May. 9, 2017 at 2:48 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Searching For Value


Apr. 20, 2017 at 1:50 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





You Must Be Crazy! - A Leveraged Portfolio


Apr. 13, 2017 at 10:41 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Validus Holdings (VR) and its Units Receive Rating Action


Apr. 6, 2017 at 10:07 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





10-K: BLUE CAPITAL REINSURANCE HOLDINGS LTD.


Mar. 1, 2017 at 10:52 a.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Top Ranked Income Stocks to Buy for February 14th


Feb. 14, 2017 at 10:50 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





Aon (AON) to Divest Non-Core Operations to Blackstone


Feb. 14, 2017 at 9:20 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





Lincoln National Adds Fee-based Annuities to its Portfolio


Feb. 14, 2017 at 8:51 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





New Strong Buy Stocks for February 14th


Feb. 14, 2017 at 8:23 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





Is Blue Capital Reinsurance (BCRH) a Great Stock for Value Investors?


Feb. 10, 2017 at 9:50 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





Top Ranked Income Stocks to Buy for February 6th


Feb. 6, 2017 at 10:19 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





Year 3 Review - You Must Be Crazy!


Jan. 25, 2017 at 12:43 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Avoid High-Yield Dividend Traps


Nov. 27, 2016 at 5:42 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Hottest Financial Stocks Now – MSB MFNC WETF LOAN


Nov. 23, 2016 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





10-Q: ENDURANCE SPECIALTY HOLDINGS LTD


Nov. 7, 2016 at 3:29 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





10-Q: BLUE CAPITAL REINSURANCE HOLDINGS LTD.


Nov. 4, 2016 at 10:15 a.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





5 Insurance Stocks to Buy Now


Oct. 5, 2016 at 10:45 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





Hottest Financial Stocks Now – VHC JNS FNBC OFS


Oct. 3, 2016 at 10:30 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





10-Q: BLUE CAPITAL REINSURANCE HOLDINGS LTD.


Aug. 5, 2016 at 3:35 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





New Strong Sell Stocks for August 2nd


Aug. 2, 2016 at 8:58 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com









Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Announces Successful June 1 Renewals
Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Announces Successful June 1 Renewals

Jun. 15, 2017 at 4:15 p.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Blue Capital Declares Quarterly Dividend on Common Shares and Will Release Its Second Quarter 2017 Results on July 31, 2017
Blue Capital Declares Quarterly Dividend on Common Shares and Will Release Its Second Quarter 2017 Results on July 31, 2017

Jun. 12, 2017 at 4:15 p.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports First Quarter 2017 Financial Results
Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports First Quarter 2017 Financial Results

May. 1, 2017 at 4:11 p.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Blue Capital Declares Quarterly Dividend on Common Shares and Will Release Its First Quarter 2017 Results on May 1, 2017


Mar. 13, 2017 at 4:15 p.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports Fourth Quarter 2016 Financial Results and Declares Special Dividend


Feb. 1, 2017 at 4:06 p.m. ET
on Globe Newswire





Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Will Release Its Fourth Quarter 2016 Results on February 1, 2017


Dec. 20, 2016 at 4:17 p.m. ET
on Globe Newswire





Employers Holdings, Inc. Appoints Michael S. Paquette as Executive 
      Vice President, Chief Financial Officer


Dec. 16, 2016 at 2:21 p.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports Third Quarter 2016 Financial Results


Oct. 31, 2016 at 4:06 p.m. ET
on Globe Newswire





Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Comments on Endurance Acquisition


Oct. 6, 2016 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on Globe Newswire





Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Declares Quarterly Dividend on Common Shares and Will Release Its Third Quarter 2016 Results on October 31, 2016


Sep. 15, 2016 at 4:16 p.m. ET
on Globe Newswire





CORRECTED: Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports Second Quarter 2016 Financial Results


Aug. 1, 2016 at 6:06 p.m. ET
on Globe Newswire





Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports Second Quarter 2016 Financial Results


Aug. 1, 2016 at 4:16 p.m. ET
on Globe Newswire











Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.


            
            Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. is a reinsurance holding company, offers collateralized reinsurance in the property catastrophe market and invests in various insurance-linked securities. It operates through its wholly-owned subsidiaries: Blue Capital Re Ltd and Blue Capital Re ILS Ltd. Blue Capital Re Ltd. provides collateralized reinsurance. Blue Capital Re ILS Ltd. conducts hedging and other investment activities, including entering into industry loss warranties and purchasing catastrophe bonds, in support of Blue Capital Re's operations. The company was founded on June 24, 2013 and is headquartered in Pembroke, Bermuda.

            
            (See Full Profile)


  




Analyst Ratings



Sell
Under
Hold
Over
Buy

Number of Ratings 3
Full Ratings 





Marsh & McLennan's Mercer to Buy 1/3rd Stake in South African Biz - Analyst Blog


Jun. 27, 2014 at 7:49 a.m. ET
on Benzinga.com





Aon To Acquire National Flood Services, Boost Flood Insurance Biz - Analyst Blog


Jun. 17, 2014 at 10:40 a.m. ET
on Benzinga.com





 


Competitors




Name
Chg %
Market Cap




Maiden Holdings Ltd.
-2.68%
$969.39M


RenaissanceRe Holdings Ltd.
0.94%
$5.93B


Everest Re Group Ltd.
-2.52%
$10.95B


Validus Holdings Ltd.
-1.09%
$4.19B


Third Point Reinsurance Ltd.
0.00%
$1.55B




Competitor Data Provided By


   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





FB

0.20%








SNAP

-3.53%








GILD

0.61%








NTDOY

5.99%








F

-1.86%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.













Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




11:33 PM EDT
July 26, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
10:44pAmericans in this field have the highest rate of divorce by age 30
10:44pThese cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings
9:56pThis social network ranks as the worst for young people’s mental health (it’s not Facebook)
9:55pMove over, breathalyzers; ‘textalyzers’ could be used on drivers’ phones 
9:55pThis is the worst mistake people make at work
9:54pCities to move to if you want to work in tech — NOT including San Francisco
9:54pWhat Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss
9:50pWatch out for these surprise charges at the ER
9:49pThe open road or the open skies? Millennials choose the former...
9:48pHow an online wedding registry in my name appeared out of thin air
9:47pDon’t have a college degree? These are the industries with the best-paid jobs
9:46pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
9:46pHow to teach your kids to be better with money than you are
9:40pBack-to-school shopping goes mainstream with deals on eyewear, fitness apparel and kitchen appliances
9:39pSamsung posts record profits on back of strong Galaxy S8 sales
9:39pThe dark side of cruises
9:37pFor transgender Americans, workplace discrimination isn’t limited to the military
7:46pScaramucci on Washington back stabbers: ‘I’m more of a front-stabbing person’
7:43pFacebook keeps warning about growth, but growth doesn’t stop
6:56pFacebook heads toward $500 billion market cap after earnings
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,711.01

+97.58
+0.45%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,422.75

+10.57
+0.16%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,477.83

+0.70
+0.03%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




11:33 PM EDT
July 26, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
10:44pAmericans in this field have the highest rate of divorce by age 30
10:44pThese cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings
9:56pThis social network ranks as the worst for young people’s mental health (it’s not Facebook)
9:55pMove over, breathalyzers; ‘textalyzers’ could be used on drivers’ phones 
9:55pThis is the worst mistake people make at work
9:54pCities to move to if you want to work in tech — NOT including San Francisco
9:54pWhat Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss
9:50pWatch out for these surprise charges at the ER
9:49pThe open road or the open skies? Millennials choose the former...
9:48pHow an online wedding registry in my name appeared out of thin air
9:47pDon’t have a college degree? These are the industries with the best-paid jobs
9:46pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
9:46pHow to teach your kids to be better with money than you are
9:40pBack-to-school shopping goes mainstream with deals on eyewear, fitness apparel and kitchen appliances
9:39pSamsung posts record profits on back of strong Galaxy S8 sales
9:39pThe dark side of cruises
9:37pFor transgender Americans, workplace discrimination isn’t limited to the military
7:46pScaramucci on Washington back stabbers: ‘I’m more of a front-stabbing person’
7:43pFacebook keeps warning about growth, but growth doesn’t stop
6:56pFacebook heads toward $500 billion market cap after earnings
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,711.01

+97.58
+0.45%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,422.75

+10.57
+0.16%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,477.83

+0.70
+0.03%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Stocks/Country/United States Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Location: United States



Name
Exchange
Sector




01 Communique Laboratory Inc. (OCQLF)
OOTC
Software


1347 Property Insurance Holdings Inc. (PIH)
XNAS
Non-Life Insurance


1-800-FLOWERS.COM Inc. Cl A (FLWS)
XNAS
Specialty Retail


1pm Industries Inc. (OPMZ)
OOTC
Food Products


1st Capital Bank (CA) (FISB)
OOTC
Banking


1st Constitution Bancorp (FCCY)
XNAS
Banking


1st NRG Corp. (FNRC)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


1st Source Corp. (SRCE)
XNAS
Banking


2050 Motors Inc. (ETFM)
OOTC
Automobiles


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl A (FOXA)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl B (FOX)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21Vianet Group Inc. ADR (VNET)
XNAS
Internet/Online


22nd Century Group Inc. (XXII)
XASE
Biotechnology


24/7 Kid Doc Inc. (TVMD)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


2U Inc. (TWOU)
XNAS
Software


2xLeveraged Long E-TRACS Linked to Wells Fargo Business Development Co. Index 052441 (BDCL)
ARCX
Major International Banks


2xLeveraged Long ETRACS Wells Fargo Business Development (LBDC)
ARCX
Major International Banks


3D Eye Solutions Inc. (TDEY)
OOTC
Motion Picture/Sound Recording


3D Pioneer Systems Inc. (DPSM)
OOTC
Software


3D Systems Corp. (DDD)
XNYS
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3DIcon Corp. (TDCP)
OOTC
Software


3Dshopping.com (THDS)
OOTC
Mixed Retailing


3DX Industries Inc. (DDDX)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3i Group PLC ADR (TGOPY)
OOTC
Finance Companies


3M Co. (MMM)
XNYS
Diversified Holding Companies


3Pea International Inc. (TPNL)
XOTC
Accounting


3Power Energy Group Inc. (PSPW)
OOTC
Renewable Energy Generation


3TL Technologies Corp. (TTMZF)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


420 Property Management Inc. (FTPM)
OOTC
Real Estate Agents/Brokers


4Cable TV International Inc. (CATV)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


4Licensing Corp. (FOURQ)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


500.com Ltd. ADR (WBAI)
XNYS
Gambling Industries


51job Inc. ADR (JOBS)
XNAS
Employment/Training Services


58.com Inc. ADR (WUBA)
XNYS
Consumer Services


5Barz International Inc. (BARZ)
OOTC
Networking


5N Plus Inc. (FPLSF)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


6D Global Technologies Inc. (SIXD)
OOTC
Computer Services


808 Renewable Energy Corp. (RNWR)
OOTC
Multiutilities


88 Energy Ltd. ADR (TNGRY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


888 Holdings PLC (EIHDF)
OOTC
Gambling Industries


8Point3 Energy Partners LP (CAFD)
XNAS
Renewable Energy Generation


8X8 Inc. (EGHT)
XNAS
Wired Telecommunications Services


A Clean Slate Inc. (DRWN)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


A&W Revenue Royalties Income Fund (AWRRF)
OOTC
Restaurants


A. H. Belo Corp. Series A (AHC)
XNYS
Publishing


A. Schulman Inc. (SHLM)
XNAS
Commodity Chemicals


A. Schulman Inc. 6% Pfd. (SLMNP)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


A.D. Makepeace Co. (MAKE)
OOTC
Farming


A.M. Castle & Co. (CAS)
XNYS
Wholesalers


A.O. Smith Corp. (AOS)
XNYS
Building Materials/Products


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S ADR (AMKBY)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series A (AMKAF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series B (AMKBF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.S. Roma S.p.A. (ASRAF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


A-1 Group Inc. (AWON)
OOTC
Tobacco


A10 Networks Inc. (ATEN)
XNYS
Computer Services


a2 Milk Co. Ltd. (ACOPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


AAC Holdings Inc. (AAC)
XNYS
Healthcare Provision


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. (AACAF)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. ADR (AACAY)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAON Inc. (AAON)
XNAS
Building Materials/Products


AAP Inc. (AAPJ)
OOTC
Food Products


AAR Corp. (AIR)
XNYS
Aerospace Products/Parts


Aaron's Inc. (AAN)
XNYS
Consumer Services


AB Science S.A. (ABSCF)
OOTC
Pharmaceuticals


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Biofuels Index Total Return (FUE)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Grain Index Total Return (GRU)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB&T Financial Corp. (ABTO)
OOTC
Banking


Abacus Mining & Exploration Corp. (ABCFF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abakan Inc. (ABKI)
OOTC
Industrial Products


Abattis Bioceuticals Corp. (ATTBF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abaxis Inc. (ABAX)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


ABB Ltd. (ABLZF)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABB Ltd. ADR (ABB)
XNYS
Industrial Machinery


Abbott Laboratories (ABT)
XNYS
Pharmaceuticals


AbbVie Inc. (ABBV)
XNYS
Biotechnology


Abby Inc. (ABBY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


Abcam PLC (ABCZF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abcam PLC ADR (ABCZY)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABCO Energy Inc. (ABCE)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


Abcourt Mines Inc. (ABMBF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aben Resources Ltd. (ABNAF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abengoa S.A. B (AGOAF)
OOTC
Construction


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. (ABEO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. Wt (ABEOW)
XNAS



Abercrombie & Fitch Co. (ANF)
XNYS
Clothing Retail


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Fund Inc. (FAX)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Investment Co. Ltd. (ABAKF)
OOTC
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC (ABDNF)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC ADR (ABDNY)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Australia Equity Fund Inc. (IAF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Chile Fund Inc. (CH)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Emerging Markets Smaller Company Opportunities Fund Inc. (ABE)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Global Income Fund Inc. (FCO)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Greater China Fund Inc. (GCH)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Indonesia Fund Inc. (IF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen International Inc. (AABVF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aberdeen Israel Fund Inc. (ISL)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc. (JEQ)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Latin America Equity Fund Inc. (LAQ)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Singapore Fund Inc. (SGF)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Abertis Infraestructuras S.A. ADR (ABRTY)
OOTC
Transportation Services


Ability Inc. (ABIL)
XNAS
Precision Products


Ability Inc. Wt (ABIWF)
OOTC



Abiomed Inc. (ABMD)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Abitibi Royalties Inc. (ATBYF)
OOTC
General Mining


Able Energy Inc. (ABLE)
OOTC
Gas Utilities


Ablynx N.V. (ABLYF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABM Industries Inc. (ABM)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Abraxas Petroleum Corp. (AXAS)
XNAS
Oil Extraction


Absecon Bancorp (ASCN)
OOTC
Banking


Absolute Health & Fitness Inc. (AHFI)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Absolute Software Corp. (ALSWF)
OOTC
Software


ABT Holdings Inc. (ABOT)
OOTC
Precious Metals


Abtech Holdings Inc. (ABHD)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABV Consulting Inc. (ABVN)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


AC Immune S.A. (ACIU)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acacia Communications Inc. (ACIA)
XNAS
Networking


Acacia Diversified Holdings Inc. (ACCA)
OOTC
Specialty Retail


Acacia Mining PLC (ABGLF)
OOTC
Gold


Acacia Research Corp. - Acacia Technologies (ACTG)
XNAS
Diversified Business Services


Acadia Healthcare Co. Inc. (ACHC)
XNAS
Healthcare Provision


ACADIA Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACAD)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acadia Realty Trust (AKR)
XNYS



Acadian Timber Corp. (ACAZF)
OOTC
Forestry & Wood Products


Acasti Pharma Inc. (ACST)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Accelera Innovations Inc. (ACNV)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accelerate Diagnostics Inc. (AXDX)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accelerize Inc. (ACLZ)
XOTC
Life Insurance


Acceleron Pharma Inc. (XLRN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accenture PLC Cl A (ACN)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Access National Corp. (ANCX)
XNAS
Banking


Access Power Inc. (ACCR)
OOTC
Wired Telecommunications Services


Access Worldwide Communications Inc. (AWWC)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


Acciona S.A. (ACXIF)
OOTC
Construction


ACCO Brands Corp. (ACCO)
XNYS
Nondurable Household Products


Accor S.A. (ACRFF)
OOTC
Hotels


Accor S.A. ADR (ACCYY)
OOTC
Hotels


Accordia Golf Co. Ltd. (ACGFF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Accredited Mortgage Loan REIT Trust 9.75% Perp. Cum. Pfd. Series A (AHHAP)
OOTC
Mortgages


Accretive Health Inc. (ACHI)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accuray Inc. (ARAY)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Accuride Corp. (ACW)
XNYS
Auto & Commercial Vehicle Parts


AcelRx Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACRX)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Acer Inc. GDR Reg S (ACEYY)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


Acerus Pharmaceuticals Corp. (TRLPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Aceto Corp. (ACET)
XNAS
Specialty Chemicals


Achaogen Inc. (AKAO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Achillion Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACHN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


ACI Worldwide Inc. (ACIW)
XNAS
Software



«1234567891011-2021-3031-4041-5051-6061-7071-8081-9091-94»










Log In




11:33 PM EDT
July 26, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
10:44pAmericans in this field have the highest rate of divorce by age 30
10:44pThese cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings
9:56pThis social network ranks as the worst for young people’s mental health (it’s not Facebook)
9:55pMove over, breathalyzers; ‘textalyzers’ could be used on drivers’ phones 
9:55pThis is the worst mistake people make at work
9:54pCities to move to if you want to work in tech — NOT including San Francisco
9:54pWhat Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss
9:50pWatch out for these surprise charges at the ER
9:49pThe open road or the open skies? Millennials choose the former...
9:48pHow an online wedding registry in my name appeared out of thin air
9:47pDon’t have a college degree? These are the industries with the best-paid jobs
9:46pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
9:46pHow to teach your kids to be better with money than you are
9:40pBack-to-school shopping goes mainstream with deals on eyewear, fitness apparel and kitchen appliances
9:39pSamsung posts record profits on back of strong Galaxy S8 sales
9:39pThe dark side of cruises
9:37pFor transgender Americans, workplace discrimination isn’t limited to the military
7:46pScaramucci on Washington back stabbers: ‘I’m more of a front-stabbing person’
7:43pFacebook keeps warning about growth, but growth doesn’t stop
6:56pFacebook heads toward $500 billion market cap after earnings
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,711.01

+97.58
+0.45%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,422.75

+10.57
+0.16%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,477.83

+0.70
+0.03%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































BCRH Stock Price - Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Stock Quote (U.S.: NYSE) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,711.01


97.58


0.45%











S&P 500

2,477.83


0.70


0.03%











Nasdaq

6,422.75


10.57


0.16%











GlobalDow

2,863.49


13.96


0.49%











Gold

1,269.60


14.00


1.12%











Oil

48.66


-0.09


-0.18%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



BA 
9.9




T 
5.0




AMD 
4.6




BIIB 
4.5






AKAM
-14.6




UHS
-8.2




RHI
-7.4




JNPR
-6.3














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








10:44p

Updated
Americans in this field have the highest rate of divorce by age 30



10:43p

Updated
These cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings



9:55p

Updated
This social network ranks as the worst for young people’s mental health (it’s not Facebook)



9:55p

Updated
Move over, breathalyzers; ‘textalyzers’ could be used on drivers’ phones 



9:54p

Updated
This is the worst mistake people make at work



9:54p

Updated
Cities to move to if you want to work in tech — NOT including San Francisco



9:54p

Updated
What Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss



9:49p

Updated
Watch out for these surprise charges at the ER



9:49p

Updated
The open road or the open skies? Millennials choose the former...



9:47p

Updated
How an online wedding registry in my name appeared out of thin air












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


BCRH


Overview



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors
NYSE

 



BCRH
U.S.: NYSE


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.

Watchlist 
CreateBCRHAlert



  


After Hours

Last Updated: Jul 26, 2017 4:39 p.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
19.00



0.00
0.00%



After Hours Volume:
108





Close
Chg
Chg %




$19.00
-0.20
-1.04%





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




89.01% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    17.2K
                


                65 Day Avg. - 19.4K
            





Open: 19.15
Close: 19.00



19.0000
Day Low/High
19.5000





Day Range



17.2200
52 Week Low/High
20.8337


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$19.15



Day Range
19.0000 - 19.5000



52 Week Range
17.2200 - 20.8337



Market Cap
n/a



Shares Outstanding
8.75M



Public Float
6.25M



Beta
0.30



Rev. per Employee
n/a



P/E Ratio
n/a



EPS
n/a



Yield
6.32%



Dividend
$0.30



Ex-Dividend Date
Jun 28, 2017



Short Interest
45.69K
07/14/17


% of Float Shorted
0.73%



Average Volume
19.36K




 


Performance




5 Day


-1.55%







1 Month


2.98%







3 Month


-4.52%







YTD


2.98%







1 Year


5.91%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones










Blue Capital Reinsurance downgraded to sell from buy at UBS


Nov. 23, 2016 at 10:17 a.m. ET
by Tomi Kilgore









Blue Capital Reinsurance downgraded to market perform from outperform at Raymond James


Oct. 19, 2016 at 8:12 a.m. ET
by Tomi Kilgore







No Headlines Available











Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






10-Q: BLUE CAPITAL REINSURANCE HOLDINGS LTD.
10-Q: BLUE CAPITAL REINSURANCE HOLDINGS LTD.

May. 9, 2017 at 2:48 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Searching For Value


Apr. 20, 2017 at 1:50 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





You Must Be Crazy! - A Leveraged Portfolio


Apr. 13, 2017 at 10:41 a.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Validus Holdings (VR) and its Units Receive Rating Action


Apr. 6, 2017 at 10:07 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





10-K: BLUE CAPITAL REINSURANCE HOLDINGS LTD.


Mar. 1, 2017 at 10:52 a.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Top Ranked Income Stocks to Buy for February 14th


Feb. 14, 2017 at 10:50 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





Aon (AON) to Divest Non-Core Operations to Blackstone


Feb. 14, 2017 at 9:20 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





Lincoln National Adds Fee-based Annuities to its Portfolio


Feb. 14, 2017 at 8:51 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





New Strong Buy Stocks for February 14th


Feb. 14, 2017 at 8:23 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





Is Blue Capital Reinsurance (BCRH) a Great Stock for Value Investors?


Feb. 10, 2017 at 9:50 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





Top Ranked Income Stocks to Buy for February 6th


Feb. 6, 2017 at 10:19 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com





Year 3 Review - You Must Be Crazy!


Jan. 25, 2017 at 12:43 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Avoid High-Yield Dividend Traps


Nov. 27, 2016 at 5:42 p.m. ET
on Seeking Alpha





Hottest Financial Stocks Now – MSB MFNC WETF LOAN


Nov. 23, 2016 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





10-Q: ENDURANCE SPECIALTY HOLDINGS LTD


Nov. 7, 2016 at 3:29 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





10-Q: BLUE CAPITAL REINSURANCE HOLDINGS LTD.


Nov. 4, 2016 at 10:15 a.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





5 Insurance Stocks to Buy Now


Oct. 5, 2016 at 10:45 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





Hottest Financial Stocks Now – VHC JNS FNBC OFS


Oct. 3, 2016 at 10:30 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





10-Q: BLUE CAPITAL REINSURANCE HOLDINGS LTD.


Aug. 5, 2016 at 3:35 p.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





New Strong Sell Stocks for August 2nd


Aug. 2, 2016 at 8:58 a.m. ET
on Zacks.com









Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Announces Successful June 1 Renewals
Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Announces Successful June 1 Renewals

Jun. 15, 2017 at 4:15 p.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Blue Capital Declares Quarterly Dividend on Common Shares and Will Release Its Second Quarter 2017 Results on July 31, 2017
Blue Capital Declares Quarterly Dividend on Common Shares and Will Release Its Second Quarter 2017 Results on July 31, 2017

Jun. 12, 2017 at 4:15 p.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports First Quarter 2017 Financial Results
Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports First Quarter 2017 Financial Results

May. 1, 2017 at 4:11 p.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Blue Capital Declares Quarterly Dividend on Common Shares and Will Release Its First Quarter 2017 Results on May 1, 2017


Mar. 13, 2017 at 4:15 p.m. ET
on GlobeNewswire





Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports Fourth Quarter 2016 Financial Results and Declares Special Dividend


Feb. 1, 2017 at 4:06 p.m. ET
on Globe Newswire





Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Will Release Its Fourth Quarter 2016 Results on February 1, 2017


Dec. 20, 2016 at 4:17 p.m. ET
on Globe Newswire





Employers Holdings, Inc. Appoints Michael S. Paquette as Executive 
      Vice President, Chief Financial Officer


Dec. 16, 2016 at 2:21 p.m. ET
on BusinessWire - BZX





Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports Third Quarter 2016 Financial Results


Oct. 31, 2016 at 4:06 p.m. ET
on Globe Newswire





Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Comments on Endurance Acquisition


Oct. 6, 2016 at 8:01 a.m. ET
on Globe Newswire





Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Declares Quarterly Dividend on Common Shares and Will Release Its Third Quarter 2016 Results on October 31, 2016


Sep. 15, 2016 at 4:16 p.m. ET
on Globe Newswire





CORRECTED: Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports Second Quarter 2016 Financial Results


Aug. 1, 2016 at 6:06 p.m. ET
on Globe Newswire





Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports Second Quarter 2016 Financial Results


Aug. 1, 2016 at 4:16 p.m. ET
on Globe Newswire











Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.


            
            Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. is a reinsurance holding company, offers collateralized reinsurance in the property catastrophe market and invests in various insurance-linked securities. It operates through its wholly-owned subsidiaries: Blue Capital Re Ltd and Blue Capital Re ILS Ltd. Blue Capital Re Ltd. provides collateralized reinsurance. Blue Capital Re ILS Ltd. conducts hedging and other investment activities, including entering into industry loss warranties and purchasing catastrophe bonds, in support of Blue Capital Re's operations. The company was founded on June 24, 2013 and is headquartered in Pembroke, Bermuda.

            
            (See Full Profile)


  




Analyst Ratings



Sell
Under
Hold
Over
Buy

Number of Ratings 3
Full Ratings 





Marsh & McLennan's Mercer to Buy 1/3rd Stake in South African Biz - Analyst Blog


Jun. 27, 2014 at 7:49 a.m. ET
on Benzinga.com





Aon To Acquire National Flood Services, Boost Flood Insurance Biz - Analyst Blog


Jun. 17, 2014 at 10:40 a.m. ET
on Benzinga.com





 


Competitors




Name
Chg %
Market Cap




Maiden Holdings Ltd.
-2.68%
$969.39M


RenaissanceRe Holdings Ltd.
0.94%
$5.93B


Everest Re Group Ltd.
-2.52%
$10.95B


Validus Holdings Ltd.
-1.09%
$4.19B


Third Point Reinsurance Ltd.
0.00%
$1.55B




Competitor Data Provided By


   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





FB

0.20%








SNAP

-3.53%








GILD

0.61%








NTDOY

5.99%








F

-1.86%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.














    BCRH Insider Trading - Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Transactions - MarketWatch



































Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets


















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.

                  NYSE: BCRH
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.



After Hours
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Jul 26, 2017, 4:39 p.m.


BCRH

/quotes/zigman/23421585/composite


$
19.00




Change

0.00
0.00%

Volume
Volume 108
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/23421585/composite
Today's close

$
			19.20
		


$
				19.00
			
Change

-0.20
-1.04%





Day low
Day high
$19.00
$19.50










52 week low
52 week high

            $17.22
        

            $20.83
        




















Insider Actions for Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.



 – Purchase

 – Sale
1
 – Number of Transactions











{"OrganizationDocuments":[{"Documents":[{"document":[{"reportDateGroup":[{"reportDate":"2011-06-09","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"3","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-16","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-13","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-12","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-11","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-02","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-03-10","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"4","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-15","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]}]}]}]}]}

Date
Name
Shares
Transaction
Value





06/15/2017

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


940


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $18.83 per share.


17,700


06/15/2017

John R. Weale 
Director

1,406


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $18.83 per share.


26,474


06/15/2017

Eric Lemieux 
Director

1,406


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $18.83 per share.


26,474


06/15/2017

D. Andrew Cook 
Director

1,406


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $18.83 per share.


26,474


06/15/2017

John V. Del Col 
Director

1,308


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


06/15/2016

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


934


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.29 per share.


16,148


06/15/2016

John R. Weale 
Director

934


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.29 per share.


16,148


06/15/2016

Eric Lemieux 
Director

934


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.29 per share.


16,148


06/15/2016

D. Andrew Cook 
Director

934


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.29 per share.


16,148


02/08/2016

John R. Weale 
Director

2,800


 
Acquisition at $17.78 per share.


49,784


08/12/2015

Bill Pollett                            
President and CEO; Director

2,333


 



37,701


07/31/2015

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


4,666


 



0


07/31/2015

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


2,500,000


 



0


07/31/2015

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


410,584


 



0


07/31/2015

Christopher Lee Harris                            
Director

2,333


 



38,307


06/15/2015

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


2,800


 
Award at $17.48 per share.


48,944


06/15/2015

Bill Pollett                            
President and CEO; Director

1,400


 
Award at $17.48 per share.


24,472


06/15/2015

John R. Weale 
Director

1,400


 
Award at $17.48 per share.


24,472


06/15/2015

Eric Lemieux 
Director

1,400


 
Award at $17.48 per share.


24,472


06/15/2015

Christopher Lee Harris                            
Director

1,400


 
Award at $17.48 per share.


24,472


06/15/2015

D. Andrew Cook 
Director

1,400


 
Award at $17.48 per share.


24,472


06/15/2015

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


934


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


16,326


06/15/2015

John R. Weale 
Director

467


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


8,163


06/15/2015

Eric Lemieux 
Director

467


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


8,163


06/15/2015

D. Andrew Cook 
Director

467


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


8,163


06/15/2015

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


934


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


16,326


06/15/2015

Bill Pollett                            
President and CEO; Director

467


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


8,163


06/15/2015

John R. Weale 
Director

467


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


8,163


06/15/2015

Eric Lemieux 
Director

467


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


8,163


06/15/2015

Christopher Lee Harris                            
Director

467


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


8,163


06/15/2015

D. Andrew Cook 
Director

467


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


8,163


08/08/2014

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


7,400


 
Acquisition at $18.99 per share.


140,526


08/07/2014

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


9,000


 
Acquisition at $18.89 per share.


170,010


08/06/2014

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


7,200


 
Acquisition at $18.91 per share.


136,152


08/05/2014

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


15,000


 
Acquisition at $18.89 per share.


283,350





        Copyright 2017 FactSet Research Systems Inc. All rights reserved. Source FactSet Fundamentals.
    










Transaction Summary
Total insider purchases and sales reported to the SEC



Timeframe
Transactions
Shares




Last 3 months



                    5
                
 Purchases



                    0
                
 Sales



6,466
0



Last 6 months



                    5
                
 Purchases



                    0
                
 Sales



6,466
0



Last 12 months



                    5
                
 Purchases



                    0
                
 Sales



6,466
0







            Officers and Executives
        





Mr. Michael J. McGuire 
Chairman & Chief Executive Officer




Mr. Greg A. Garside 
Chief Financial Officer




Mr. John V. Del Col 
Director & Secretary




Mr. John R. Weale 
Independent Director




Mr. Eric  Lemieux 
Lead Independent Director




Mr. D. Andrew Cook 
Independent Director
















Log In




11:33 PM EDT
July 26, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
10:44pAmericans in this field have the highest rate of divorce by age 30
10:44pThese cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings
9:56pThis social network ranks as the worst for young people’s mental health (it’s not Facebook)
9:55pMove over, breathalyzers; ‘textalyzers’ could be used on drivers’ phones 
9:55pThis is the worst mistake people make at work
9:54pCities to move to if you want to work in tech — NOT including San Francisco
9:54pWhat Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss
9:50pWatch out for these surprise charges at the ER
9:49pThe open road or the open skies? Millennials choose the former...
9:48pHow an online wedding registry in my name appeared out of thin air
9:47pDon’t have a college degree? These are the industries with the best-paid jobs
9:46pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
9:46pHow to teach your kids to be better with money than you are
9:40pBack-to-school shopping goes mainstream with deals on eyewear, fitness apparel and kitchen appliances
9:39pSamsung posts record profits on back of strong Galaxy S8 sales
9:39pThe dark side of cruises
9:37pFor transgender Americans, workplace discrimination isn’t limited to the military
7:46pScaramucci on Washington back stabbers: ‘I’m more of a front-stabbing person’
7:43pFacebook keeps warning about growth, but growth doesn’t stop
6:56pFacebook heads toward $500 billion market cap after earnings
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,711.01

+97.58
+0.45%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,422.75

+10.57
+0.16%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,477.83

+0.70
+0.03%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15
























































BCRH Stock Charts - Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Interactive Charts - MarketWatch



























 















































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,711.01


97.58


0.45%











S&P 500

2,477.83


0.70


0.03%











Nasdaq

6,422.75


10.57


0.16%











GlobalDow

2,863.56


14.03


0.49%











Gold

1,269.60


14.00


1.12%











Oil

48.66


-0.09


-0.18%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



BA 
9.9




T 
5.0




AMD 
4.6




BIIB 
4.5






AKAM
-14.6




UHS
-8.2




RHI
-7.4




JNPR
-6.3














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








10:44p

Updated
Americans in this field have the highest rate of divorce by age 30



10:43p

Updated
These cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings



9:55p

Updated
This social network ranks as the worst for young people’s mental health (it’s not Facebook)



9:55p

Updated
Move over, breathalyzers; ‘textalyzers’ could be used on drivers’ phones 



9:54p

Updated
This is the worst mistake people make at work



9:54p

Updated
Cities to move to if you want to work in tech — NOT including San Francisco



9:54p

Updated
What Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss



9:49p

Updated
Watch out for these surprise charges at the ER



9:49p

Updated
The open road or the open skies? Millennials choose the former...



9:47p

Updated
How an online wedding registry in my name appeared out of thin air












to be replaced

























































































































    






   




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


BCRH


Advanced Chart



Compare Quotes
Stock Screener
Earnings Calendar
Sectors
NYSE

 



BCRH
U.S.: NYSE


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.

Watchlist 
CreateBCRHAlert



  


After Hours

Last Updated: Jul 26, 2017 4:39 p.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
19.00



0.00
0.00%



After Hours Volume:
108





Close
Chg
Chg %




$19.00
-0.20
-1.04%





   







   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





FB

0.20%








SNAP

-3.53%








GILD

0.61%








NTDOY

5.99%








F

-1.86%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.













BCRH Annual Income Statement - Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Annual Financials



































Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets


















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.

                  NYSE: BCRH
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.



After Hours
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Jul 26, 2017, 4:39 p.m.


BCRH

/quotes/zigman/23421585/composite


$
19.00




Change

0.00
0.00%

Volume
Volume 108
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/23421585/composite
Today's close

$
			19.20
		


$
				19.00
			
Change

-0.20
-1.04%





Day low
Day high
$19.00
$19.50










52 week low
52 week high

            $17.22
        

            $20.83
        


















Income Statement


Balance Sheet


Cash Flow Statement


Annual Financials
Quarter Financials




Annual Financials for Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.


View Ratios




Fiscal year is January-December. All values USD millions.
2013201420152016
5-year trend




 Sales/Revenue
--43.9M38.3M42.6M


Premiums Earned
--43.9M38.3M43.6M


Total Investment Income
-----


Realized Gains (Losses)
-----


Other Operating Income
----(1M)


Sales Growth
----12.76%11.23%


 Losses, Claims & Reserves
--17.1M2.6M13.7M


Losses, Benefits & Adjustments
--17.1M2.6M13.7M


Losses, Claims & Reserves Growth
----84.80%426.92%


Loss Ratio
----31.42%NA









2013201420152016
5-year trend




 Selling, General & Admin. Expenses & Other
-700,00012.2M14.9M14.6M


Selling, General & Admin. Expenses
-700,00012.2M14.7M14.6M


Other Selling, General & Admin. Expense
-700,0004.5M6.1M5M


Underwriting & Commissions
--7.7M8.6M9.6M


Other Operating Expense
---200,000-


SGA Growth
--1,642.86%22.13%-2.01%


 Operating Income Before Interest Expense
-(700,000)14.6M20.8M14.3M


Interest Expense, Net of Interest Capitalized
--200,000100,000-


Interest Expense (excl. Interest Capitalized)
--200,000100,000-


Interest Capitalized
-----


Operating Income After Interest Expense
-(700,000)14.4M20.7M14.3M


Operating Income Growth
--2,185.71%42.47%-31.25%


Non-Operating Income (Expense)
--700,000--


Miscellaneous Non Operating Expense
--700,000--


Equity in Affiliates (Pretax)
-----


Unusual Expense
-----


 Pretax Income
-(700,000)15.1M20.7M14.3M


Pretax Income Growth
--2,257.14%37.09%-30.92%


Income Taxes
-----


Income Tax - Current - Domestic
-----


Income Tax - Current - Foreign
-----


Income Tax - Deferred - Domestic
-----


Income Tax - Deferred - Foreign
-----


Income Tax Credits
-----


Equity in Affiliates
-----


Other After Tax Income (Expense)
-----


Consolidated Net Income
-(700,000)15.1M20.7M14.3M


Minority Interest Expense
-----


 Net Income
-(700,000)15.1M20.7M14.3M


Net Income Growth
--2,257.14%37.09%-30.92%


Net Margin
----33.57%NA


Extraordinaries & Discontinued Operations
-----


Extra Items & Gain/Loss Sale Of Assets
-----


Cumulative Effect - Accounting Chg
-----


Discontinued Operations
-----


Net Income After Extraordinaries
-(700,000)15.1M20.7M14.3M


Preferred Dividends
-----


Net Income Available to Common
-(700,000)15.1M20.7M14.3M


 EPS (Basic)
-(0.31)1.732.371.63


EPS (Basic) Growth
--656.68%37.07%-31.09%


Basic Shares Outstanding
-2.3M8.75M8.75M8.75M


 EPS (Diluted)
-(0.31)1.732.371.63


EPS (Diluted) Growth
--656.68%37.07%-31.09%


Diluted Shares Outstanding
-2.3M8.75M8.75M8.75M




            Copyright 2017 FactSet Research Systems Inc. All rights reserved. Source FactSet Fundamentals.
        







Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




11:33 PM EDT
July 26, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
10:44pAmericans in this field have the highest rate of divorce by age 30
10:44pThese cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings
9:56pThis social network ranks as the worst for young people’s mental health (it’s not Facebook)
9:55pMove over, breathalyzers; ‘textalyzers’ could be used on drivers’ phones 
9:55pThis is the worst mistake people make at work
9:54pCities to move to if you want to work in tech — NOT including San Francisco
9:54pWhat Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss
9:50pWatch out for these surprise charges at the ER
9:49pThe open road or the open skies? Millennials choose the former...
9:48pHow an online wedding registry in my name appeared out of thin air
9:47pDon’t have a college degree? These are the industries with the best-paid jobs
9:46pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
9:46pHow to teach your kids to be better with money than you are
9:40pBack-to-school shopping goes mainstream with deals on eyewear, fitness apparel and kitchen appliances
9:39pSamsung posts record profits on back of strong Galaxy S8 sales
9:39pThe dark side of cruises
9:37pFor transgender Americans, workplace discrimination isn’t limited to the military
7:46pScaramucci on Washington back stabbers: ‘I’m more of a front-stabbing person’
7:43pFacebook keeps warning about growth, but growth doesn’t stop
6:56pFacebook heads toward $500 billion market cap after earnings
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,711.01

+97.58
+0.45%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,422.75

+10.57
+0.16%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,477.83

+0.70
+0.03%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



























































    BCRH Analyst Estimates - Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Analyst Estimates - MarketWatch



































Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets


















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.

                  NYSE: BCRH
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.



After Hours
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Jul 26, 2017, 4:39 p.m.


BCRH

/quotes/zigman/23421585/composite


$
19.00




Change

0.00
0.00%

Volume
Volume 108
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/23421585/composite
Today's close

$
			19.20
		


$
				19.00
			
Change

-0.20
-1.04%





Day low
Day high
$19.00
$19.50










52 week low
52 week high

            $17.22
        

            $20.83
        

















Snapshot




Average Recommendation:

                Hold
            
Average Target Price:
19.00


Number of Ratings:

                3
            
Current Quarters Estimate:
0.45


FY Report Date:

                12 / 2017
            
Current Year's Estimate:
1.75


Last Quarter's Earnings:
0.47
Median PE on CY Estimate:
9.99


Year Ago Earnings:
1.24
Next Fiscal Year Estimate:
1.87




Median PE on Next FY Estimate:
9.25




Earnings Per Share




 
This Quarter
Next Quarter
This Fiscal
Next Fiscal




# of Estimates
3.00
3.00
3.00
3.00


Mean Estimate
0.45
0.29
1.75
1.87


High Estimates
0.59
0.33
1.90
2.05


Low Estimates
0.36
0.26
1.60
1.70


Coefficient Variance
26.08
13.72
8.49
9.39




Analysts Recommendations




 
current
1 Month Ago
3 Months Ago




BUY
1
1
1


OVERWEIGHT
0
0
0


HOLD
1
1
1


UNDERWEIGHT
0
0
0


SELL
1
1
1


MEAN
Hold
Hold
Hold





Mean Recomendation Conversion Table
1.00 thru 1.24 = Buy
1.25 thru 1.74 = Overweight
1.75 thru 2.24 = Hold
2.25 thru 2.74 = Underweight
2.75 thru 3.00 = Sell


        Copyright 2017 FactSet Research Systems Inc. All rights reserved. Source FactSet Fundamentals.
    











Earnings Summaries





Marsh & McLennan Grasps New 52-Week High Ahead of Q2 Earnings


5:14 p.m. July 15, 2014

 - Benzinga.com









Analyst Recommendations





Marsh & McLennan's Mercer to Buy 1/3rd Stake in South African Biz - Analyst Blog


7:48 a.m. June 27, 2014

 - Benzinga.com





Aon To Acquire National Flood Services, Boost Flood Insurance Biz - Analyst Blog


10:40 a.m. June 17, 2014

 - Benzinga.com












Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




11:33 PM EDT
July 26, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
10:44pAmericans in this field have the highest rate of divorce by age 30
10:44pThese cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings
9:56pThis social network ranks as the worst for young people’s mental health (it’s not Facebook)
9:55pMove over, breathalyzers; ‘textalyzers’ could be used on drivers’ phones 
9:55pThis is the worst mistake people make at work
9:54pCities to move to if you want to work in tech — NOT including San Francisco
9:54pWhat Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss
9:50pWatch out for these surprise charges at the ER
9:49pThe open road or the open skies? Millennials choose the former...
9:48pHow an online wedding registry in my name appeared out of thin air
9:47pDon’t have a college degree? These are the industries with the best-paid jobs
9:46pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
9:46pHow to teach your kids to be better with money than you are
9:40pBack-to-school shopping goes mainstream with deals on eyewear, fitness apparel and kitchen appliances
9:39pSamsung posts record profits on back of strong Galaxy S8 sales
9:39pThe dark side of cruises
9:37pFor transgender Americans, workplace discrimination isn’t limited to the military
7:46pScaramucci on Washington back stabbers: ‘I’m more of a front-stabbing person’
7:43pFacebook keeps warning about growth, but growth doesn’t stop
6:56pFacebook heads toward $500 billion market cap after earnings
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,711.01

+97.58
+0.45%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,422.75

+10.57
+0.16%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,477.83

+0.70
+0.03%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


























































    BCRH SEC Filings - Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. SEC Filings - MarketWatch




































Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets


















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.

                  NYSE: BCRH
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.



After Hours
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Jul 26, 2017, 4:39 p.m.


BCRH

/quotes/zigman/23421585/composite


$
19.00




Change

0.00
0.00%

Volume
Volume 108
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/23421585/composite
Today's close

$
			19.20
		


$
				19.00
			
Change

-0.20
-1.04%





Day low
Day high
$19.00
$19.50










52 week low
52 week high

            $17.22
        

            $20.83
        

















Show All


8-K



10-K



10-Q



Proxy



Registration



13D



13F



13G







SEC Filings for Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.
    
Getting Started with SEC Filings



Filing Date
Document Date
Type
Category
Amended



06/15/2017


06/15/2017


8-K


Special Events







05/15/2017


05/15/2017


8-K


Special Events







05/10/2017


05/09/2017


8-K


Special Events







05/09/2017


03/31/2017


10-Q


Quarterly Reports







05/01/2017


05/01/2017


8-K


Special Events







04/25/2017


04/21/2017


8-K


Special Events







03/29/2017


N/A


SC 13D/A


N/A


*




03/16/2017


05/09/2017


DEF 14A


Proxy Statement







03/01/2017


12/31/2016


10-K


Annual Reports







02/22/2017


02/22/2017


8-K


Special Events







02/09/2017


N/A


SC 13G


Institutional Ownership







02/07/2017


N/A


SC 13G


Institutional Ownership







02/01/2017


02/01/2017


8-K


Special Events







11/14/2016


11/14/2016


8-K


Special Events







11/04/2016


09/30/2016


10-Q


Quarterly Reports







10/31/2016


10/31/2016


8-K


Special Events







10/06/2016


10/05/2016


8-K


Special Events







08/22/2016


08/22/2016


8-K


Special Events







08/05/2016


06/30/2016


10-Q


Quarterly Reports







08/01/2016


08/01/2016


8-K


Special Events









More...





      SEC Filings provided by EDGAR Online, Inc.















Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




11:33 PM EDT
July 26, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
10:44pAmericans in this field have the highest rate of divorce by age 30
10:44pThese cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings
9:56pThis social network ranks as the worst for young people’s mental health (it’s not Facebook)
9:55pMove over, breathalyzers; ‘textalyzers’ could be used on drivers’ phones 
9:55pThis is the worst mistake people make at work
9:54pCities to move to if you want to work in tech — NOT including San Francisco
9:54pWhat Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss
9:50pWatch out for these surprise charges at the ER
9:49pThe open road or the open skies? Millennials choose the former...
9:48pHow an online wedding registry in my name appeared out of thin air
9:47pDon’t have a college degree? These are the industries with the best-paid jobs
9:46pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
9:46pHow to teach your kids to be better with money than you are
9:40pBack-to-school shopping goes mainstream with deals on eyewear, fitness apparel and kitchen appliances
9:39pSamsung posts record profits on back of strong Galaxy S8 sales
9:39pThe dark side of cruises
9:37pFor transgender Americans, workplace discrimination isn’t limited to the military
7:46pScaramucci on Washington back stabbers: ‘I’m more of a front-stabbing person’
7:43pFacebook keeps warning about growth, but growth doesn’t stop
6:56pFacebook heads toward $500 billion market cap after earnings
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,711.01

+97.58
+0.45%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,422.75

+10.57
+0.16%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,477.83

+0.70
+0.03%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15

























































    BCRH Key Statistics - Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Financial Ratios - MarketWatch




































Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets


















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.

                  NYSE: BCRH
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.



After Hours
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Jul 26, 2017, 4:39 p.m.


BCRH

/quotes/zigman/23421585/composite


$
19.00




Change

0.00
0.00%

Volume
Volume 108
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/23421585/composite
Today's close

$
			19.20
		


$
				19.00
			
Change

-0.20
-1.04%





Day low
Day high
$19.00
$19.50










52 week low
52 week high

            $17.22
        

            $20.83
        

















			Company Description 


			Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. is a reinsurance holding company, offers collateralized reinsurance in the property catastrophe market and invests in various insurance-linked securities. It operates through its wholly-owned subsidiaries: Blue Capital Re Ltd and Blue Capital Re ILS Ltd. Blue C...
		


                Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. is a reinsurance holding company, offers collateralized reinsurance in the property catastrophe market and invests in various insurance-linked securities. It operates through its wholly-owned subsidiaries: Blue Capital Re Ltd and Blue Capital Re ILS Ltd. Blue Capital Re Ltd. provides collateralized reinsurance. Blue Capital Re ILS Ltd. conducts hedging and other investment activities, including entering into industry loss warranties and purchasing catastrophe bonds, in support of Blue Capital Re's operations. The company was founded on June 24, 2013 and is headquartered in Pembroke, Bermuda.
            




Valuation

P/E Current
11.78


P/E Ratio (with extraordinary items)
12.55


P/E Ratio (without extraordinary items)
11.32


Price to Sales Ratio
3.79


Price to Book Ratio
0.88


Price to Cash Flow Ratio
5.31


Enterprise Value to Sales
3.83

Efficiency

Total Asset Turnover
0.20



Profitability

Operating Margin
33.57


Pretax Margin
33.57


Net Margin
33.57


Return on Assets
6.77


Return on Equity
7.71


Return on Total Capital
7.45


Return on Invested Capital
7.71

Capital Structure




      Officers and Executives
    



Name
Age
Officer Since
Title





Mr. Michael J. McGuire 
44
2015
Chairman & Chief Executive Officer



Mr. Greg A. Garside 
-
2015
Chief Financial Officer



Mr. John V. Del Col 
54
-
Director & Secretary



Mr. Eric  Lemieux 
55
2013
Lead Independent Director





Insider Actions


 – Purchase

 – Sale
1
 – Number of Transactions











{"OrganizationDocuments":[{"Documents":[{"document":[{"reportDateGroup":[{"reportDate":"2011-06-09","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"3","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-16","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-13","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-12","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-11","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-02","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-03-10","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"4","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-15","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]}]}]}]}]}


Date
Name
Shares
Transaction
Value





06/15/2017

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


940


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $18.83 per share.


17,700


06/15/2017

John R. Weale 
Director

1,406


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $18.83 per share.


26,474


06/15/2017

Eric Lemieux 
Director

1,406


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $18.83 per share.


26,474


06/15/2017

D. Andrew Cook 
Director

1,406


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $18.83 per share.


26,474


06/15/2017

John V. Del Col 
Director

1,308


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $0 per share.


0


06/15/2016

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


934


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.29 per share.


16,148


06/15/2016

John R. Weale 
Director

934


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.29 per share.


16,148


06/15/2016

Eric Lemieux 
Director

934


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.29 per share.


16,148


06/15/2016

D. Andrew Cook 
Director

934


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.29 per share.


16,148


02/08/2016

John R. Weale 
Director

2,800


 
Acquisition at $17.78 per share.


49,784


08/12/2015

Bill Pollett                            
President and CEO; Director

2,333


 



37,701


07/31/2015

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


4,666


 



0


07/31/2015

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


2,500,000


 



0


07/31/2015

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


410,584


 



0


07/31/2015

Christopher Lee Harris                            
Director

2,333


 



38,307


06/15/2015

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


2,800


 
Award at $17.48 per share.


48,944


06/15/2015

Bill Pollett                            
President and CEO; Director

1,400


 
Award at $17.48 per share.


24,472


06/15/2015

John R. Weale 
Director

1,400


 
Award at $17.48 per share.


24,472


06/15/2015

Eric Lemieux 
Director

1,400


 
Award at $17.48 per share.


24,472


06/15/2015

Christopher Lee Harris                            
Director

1,400


 
Award at $17.48 per share.


24,472


06/15/2015

D. Andrew Cook 
Director

1,400


 
Award at $17.48 per share.


24,472


06/15/2015

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


934


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


16,326


06/15/2015

John R. Weale 
Director

467


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


8,163


06/15/2015

Eric Lemieux 
Director

467


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


8,163


06/15/2015

D. Andrew Cook 
Director

467


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


8,163


06/15/2015

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


934


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


16,326


06/15/2015

Bill Pollett                            
President and CEO; Director

467


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


8,163


06/15/2015

John R. Weale 
Director

467


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


8,163


06/15/2015

Eric Lemieux 
Director

467


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


8,163


06/15/2015

Christopher Lee Harris                            
Director

467


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


8,163


06/15/2015

D. Andrew Cook 
Director

467


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $17.48 per share.


8,163


08/08/2014

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


7,400


 
Acquisition at $18.99 per share.


140,526


08/07/2014

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


9,000


 
Acquisition at $18.89 per share.


170,010


08/06/2014

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


7,200


 
Acquisition at $18.91 per share.


136,152


08/05/2014

Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd.                            


15,000


 
Acquisition at $18.89 per share.


283,350








/news/latest/company/us/bcrh

      MarketWatch News on BCRH
    




 Blue Capital Reinsurance downgraded to sell from buy at UBS
11:17 a.m. Nov. 23, 2016
 - Tomi Kilgore




 Blue Capital Reinsurance downgraded to market perform from outperform at Raymond James
8:12 a.m. Oct. 19, 2016
 - Tomi Kilgore









/news/nonmarketwatch/company/us/bcrh

      Other News on BCRH
    




 10-Q: BLUE CAPITAL REINSURANCE HOLDINGS LTD.
2:48 p.m. May 9, 2017
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Searching For Value

1:50 a.m. April 20, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





You Must Be Crazy! - A Leveraged Portfolio

10:41 a.m. April 13, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Validus Holdings (VR) and its Units Receive Rating Action

10:07 a.m. April 6, 2017
 - Zacks.com




 10-K: BLUE CAPITAL REINSURANCE HOLDINGS LTD.
11:52 a.m. March 1, 2017
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Top Ranked Income Stocks to Buy for February 14th

11:50 a.m. Feb. 14, 2017
 - Zacks.com





Aon (AON) to Divest Non-Core Operations to Blackstone

10:20 a.m. Feb. 14, 2017
 - Zacks.com





Lincoln National Adds Fee-based Annuities to its Portfolio

9:51 a.m. Feb. 14, 2017
 - Zacks.com





New Strong Buy Stocks for February 14th

9:23 a.m. Feb. 14, 2017
 - Zacks.com





Is Blue Capital Reinsurance (BCRH) a Great Stock for Value Investors?

10:50 a.m. Feb. 10, 2017
 - Zacks.com





Top Ranked Income Stocks to Buy for February 6th

11:19 a.m. Feb. 6, 2017
 - Zacks.com





Year 3 Review - You Must Be Crazy!

1:43 p.m. Jan. 25, 2017
 - Seeking Alpha





Avoid High-Yield Dividend Traps

6:42 p.m. Nov. 27, 2016
 - Seeking Alpha





Hottest Financial Stocks Now – MSB MFNC WETF LOAN

5:30 p.m. Nov. 23, 2016
 - InvestorPlace.com




 10-Q: ENDURANCE SPECIALTY HOLDINGS LTD
4:29 p.m. Nov. 7, 2016
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




 10-Q: BLUE CAPITAL REINSURANCE HOLDINGS LTD.
10:14 a.m. Nov. 4, 2016
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





5 Insurance Stocks to Buy Now

10:45 a.m. Oct. 5, 2016
 - InvestorPlace.com





Hottest Financial Stocks Now – VHC JNS FNBC OFS

10:30 a.m. Oct. 3, 2016
 - InvestorPlace.com




 10-Q: BLUE CAPITAL REINSURANCE HOLDINGS LTD.
3:35 p.m. Aug. 5, 2016
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





New Strong Sell Stocks for August 2nd

8:58 a.m. Aug. 2, 2016
 - Zacks.com


Loading more headlines...












At a Glance

Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.
Waterloo House
100 Pitts Bay Road

Pembroke, HA HM 08




Phone
1 4412780400


Industry
Reinsurance


Sector
Financial Services


Fiscal Year-end
12/2017


View SEC Filings




Revenue
$42.60M


Net Income
$14.30M


2016 Sales Growth 
11.2%


Employees

        -


Annual Report for BCRH











/news/pressrelease/company/us/bcrh

      Press Releases on BCRH
    




 Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Announces Successful June 1 Renewals
4:15 p.m. June 15, 2017
 - GlobeNewswire




 Blue Capital Declares Quarterly Dividend on Common Shares and Will Release Its Second Quarter 2017 Results on July 31, 2017
4:15 p.m. June 12, 2017
 - GlobeNewswire




 Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports First Quarter 2017 Financial Results
4:11 p.m. May 1, 2017
 - GlobeNewswire




 Blue Capital Declares Quarterly Dividend on Common Shares and Will Release Its First Quarter 2017 Results on May 1, 2017
4:15 p.m. March 13, 2017
 - GlobeNewswire




 Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports Fourth Quarter 2016 Financial Results and Declares Special Dividend
5:05 p.m. Feb. 1, 2017
 - Globe Newswire




 Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Will Release Its Fourth Quarter 2016 Results on February 1, 2017
5:16 p.m. Dec. 20, 2016
 - Globe Newswire




 Employers Holdings, Inc. Appoints Michael S. Paquette as Executive 
      Vice President, Chief Financial Officer
3:21 p.m. Dec. 16, 2016
 - BusinessWire - BZX




 Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports Third Quarter 2016 Financial Results
4:05 p.m. Oct. 31, 2016
 - Globe Newswire




 Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Comments on Endurance Acquisition
8:01 a.m. Oct. 6, 2016
 - Globe Newswire




 Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Declares Quarterly Dividend on Common Shares and Will Release Its Third Quarter 2016 Results on October 31, 2016
4:16 p.m. Sept. 15, 2016
 - Globe Newswire




 CORRECTED: Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports Second Quarter 2016 Financial Results
6:05 p.m. Aug. 1, 2016
 - Globe Newswire




 Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports Second Quarter 2016 Financial Results
4:15 p.m. Aug. 1, 2016
 - Globe Newswire











Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




11:33 PM EDT
July 26, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
10:44pAmericans in this field have the highest rate of divorce by age 30
10:44pThese cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings
9:56pThis social network ranks as the worst for young people’s mental health (it’s not Facebook)
9:55pMove over, breathalyzers; ‘textalyzers’ could be used on drivers’ phones 
9:55pThis is the worst mistake people make at work
9:54pCities to move to if you want to work in tech — NOT including San Francisco
9:54pWhat Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss
9:50pWatch out for these surprise charges at the ER
9:49pThe open road or the open skies? Millennials choose the former...
9:48pHow an online wedding registry in my name appeared out of thin air
9:47pDon’t have a college degree? These are the industries with the best-paid jobs
9:46pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
9:46pHow to teach your kids to be better with money than you are
9:40pBack-to-school shopping goes mainstream with deals on eyewear, fitness apparel and kitchen appliances
9:39pSamsung posts record profits on back of strong Galaxy S8 sales
9:39pThe dark side of cruises
9:37pFor transgender Americans, workplace discrimination isn’t limited to the military
7:46pScaramucci on Washington back stabbers: ‘I’m more of a front-stabbing person’
7:43pFacebook keeps warning about growth, but growth doesn’t stop
6:56pFacebook heads toward $500 billion market cap after earnings
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,711.01

+97.58
+0.45%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,422.75

+10.57
+0.16%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,477.83

+0.70
+0.03%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


































































Products | Blue Capital



























Skip to main content









              Blue Capital Management Ltd.          






          Blue Capital Management Ltd.    







 




Products



Open Ended Funds
Subscribe to Monthly Open Ended Fund Fact Sheets
Blue Capital has two open ended funds which allow for monthly subscriptions and quarterly redemptions of NAV. Blue Capital Management Ltd. (“Blue Capital”) is the wholly-owned asset management platform of Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd., a member of the Sompo International group of companies and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Sompo Holdings, Inc. Blue Capital is the investment manager for both Funds. Sompo International is a recognized global specialty provider of property and casualty insurance and reinsurance and a leader in property catastrophe and short tail reinsurance since 2001.
Blue Capital Mid Vol Fund (“BCMV”) launched in June 2012 and focuses solely on the traditional reinsurance market through a three pillar approach to investing. Each investment made by the Fund is allocated to one of three pillars; “Mid Market”, “Top Layer”, and “Select” catastrophe contracts. Its core investment strategy is predicated upon flexible and opportunistic execution within the Insurance Linked Securities market. The Fund looks to assemble a complementary portfolio of risks across various segments within the reinsurance asset class, by differentiating relative across the industry’s capital structure, and the various points across the reinsurance market pricing cycle.
Blue Capital Low Vol Fund (“BCLV”) launched in February 2014 and invests in Insurance-Linked Securities offering some of the lowest risk levels available in the reinsurance market (as measured by modeled expected loss per security). Where an insurance company purchases a tower of reinsurance protection split across a number of risk tranches, Insurance-Linked Securities eligible for inclusion in the Fund will be those linked to the performance of the most senior reinsurance tranches hedged by the insurer. In this way, for an Insurance-Linked Security included in the Fund to suffer a loss all participating reinsurers and investors on layers junior to such investment must have experienced a total loss of principal.
Listed Vehicles
Blue Capital Alternative Investment Fund Limited & Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.
Our U.K. and U.S. publicly-listed vehicles provide qualified institutional and retail investors the opportunity to invest in a portfolio of select catastrophe reinsurance risks which are largely uncorrelated to other asset classes.
By leveraging the Sompo International platform, Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. (NYSE: BCRH) and Blue Capital Alternative Investment Fund Limited (LSE: BCAI) are able to invest broadly across the global catastrophe reinsurance market.
Funds of One
Customized Investment Portfolios
Blue Capital Management Ltd. offers customized investment portfolios to qualified institutional investors via a “fund of one” segregated account at the Master Fund. The investment guidelines are customized to meet the investor’s objectives and risk tolerance. The portfolio is invested via Blue Water Re and, in all other respects, is managed in the same way as the closed- and open-ended funds.
Private Sidecars
Blue Capital is able to provide turnkey solutions for qualified investors interested in participating in the global property catastrophe reinsurance market through a customized quota share with Sompo International, a leading global specialty insurer and reinsurer.
 


















Print Page

 | 







Email Page

 | 







Subscribe to Monthly Facts





















Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Announces Successful June 1 Renewals - NASDAQ.com








































































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search















































See headlines for BCRH


View Print Version
                        
More from GlobeNewswire



Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Announces Successful June 1 Renewals
Blue Capital Declares Quarterly Dividend on Common Shares and Will Release Its Second Quarter 2017 Results on July 31, 2017
Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports First Quarter 2017 Financial Results



Referenced Stocks


BCRH
0%
Rate It





Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Announces Successful June 1 Renewals


By GlobeNewswire,  June 15, 2017, 04:15:00 PM EDT








Vote up







A
A
A









HAMILTON, Bermuda, June  15, 2017  (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. (NYSE:BCRH) ("Blue Capital"), a Bermuda holding company that, through its operating subsidiaries, offers collateralized reinsurance in the property catastrophe market and invests in various insurance-linked securities, today provided a portfolio update.
Mike McGuire, Chairman and CEO of Blue Capital, commented: "We are pleased to report strong portfolio execution during the June renewal period.  Overall market price reductions were larger than initially anticipated, with the Florida market being 5% - 7.5% down year on year.  However, due to the strength of our established long term relationships, the high quality of our underwriting and portfolio management teams and our strategic alignment with Sompo International, we were able to construct an attractive portfolio with risk adjusted pricing down 3%." 
As of June 1, 2017 the Company bound indemnity reinsurance contracts with expected total annual premiums of $4.7 million, an increase of $2.0 million when compared to the same period in 2016. The business underwritten by the Company is expected to produce a net rate on line for the portfolio of 17.7%, which is an increase of 170 basis points when compared to the same period in 2016. The higher rate on line is a result of increased deployment in the June renewal period, which was primarily focused on Florida exposed accounts that have a higher rate on line than the portfolio average.
The Company's in-force portfolio deployed as of June 1, 2017 consisted of approximately 30.2% in support of first event reinsurance coverages, 46.2% in support of catastrophe quota share coverages and the balance in support of second and subsequent event coverages.
A breakdown of the current portfolio is set out below:
Portfolio Summary
The following unaudited tables provide a breakdown of the of the Company's portfolio by contract type, zone and peril (as at 1 June 2017). Exposure is defined as deployed collateral plus net premium minus ultimate losses.


Contract Type
Exposure(US $millions)
 
Exposure as a% of CurrentPortfolio
 
PositionsHeld


Property Catastrophe Total
143.0
 
89.8
%
 
83



  Prop Cat - First Event XOL


121.9

 

76.6


%

 

67




  Prop Cat - Subsequent Event XOL


11.5

 

7.2


%

 

10




  Prop Cat - Aggregate XOL


9.6

 

6.0


%

 

6



Industry Loss Warranty Total
13.2
 
8.3
%
 
4



  ILW - Subsequent Event XOL 


13.2

 

8.3


%

 

4




  ILW - First Event XOL 


0.0

 

0.0


%

 

0




  ILW - Aggregate XOL


0.0

 

0.0


%

 

0



Cat Bond Total
0
 
0.0
%
 
0


Retrocessional Hedging Total
3.0
 
1.9
%
 
3


Current Portfolio
159.2
 
100
%
 
90


XOL = excess of loss               ILW = Industry Loss Warranty                       


Asset Class
Investment(US$millions)
 
Investment asa % of CurrentPortfolio
 
PositionsHeld


Traditional
143.0
 
89.8
%
 
83



  Quota Share Retrocessional


73.7

 

46.3


%

 

21




  Indemnity Retrocession


37.9

 

23.8


%

 

15




  Indemnity Reinsurance


31.4

 

19.7


%

 

66



Non-Traditional
13.2
 
8.3
%
 
4



  Industry Loss Warranties 


13.2

 

8.3


%

 

4




  Other non-property catastrophe risk2


0.0

 

0.0


%

 

0




  Cat Bonds


0.0

 

0.0


%

 

0



Retrocessional Hedging
3.0
 
1.9
%
 
3


Current Portfolio
159.2
 
100
%
 
90



1 Underlying positions held within the quota share retrocessional agreements totals 1,500.2 Contracts transacted in an International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc. contract format.
Portfolio Return Summary1


Illustrative Net Aggregate ReturnDistribution
2017 Portfolio


Returns
 



  No Loss Return

15
%



  Expected Return Range2

6 - 11%


Probability of:
 



  Mean or Greater Return

72
%



  Breakeven or Greater

83
%



  Loss to NAV Greater than 5% 

12
%



  Loss to NAV Greater than 10%

9
%



  Loss to NAV Greater than 15%

6
%



  Loss to NAV Greater than 25%

3
%



  Loss to NAV Greater than 35%

2
%



1 The portfolio return summary is provided for illustrative purposes only. The projections are derived by reference to the Company's modelled portfolio as at 1 June 2017 and do not take into account actual costs, expenses or other factors which are not attributable to the portfolio. As such, the in force portfolio return summary should not in any way be construed as forecasting the Company's actual returns should no losses occur or otherwise.

2 Net aggregate return distribution between a mean and median catastrophe year.
Probable Maximum Loss
The exposures summarised below represent the sum of all collateral invested less reinsurance recoverable. Per the Company's Investment Policy, the net first event Probable Maximum Loss ("PML") in any one zone will not exceed 35% of the Company's Shareholder's Equity (at the time the investment is made). For contracts that overlap zones, the total exposure is counted in each of the exposed zones.


Territory / Region / Peril
First EventVaR1 as a %of NAV


US - Florida Hurricane
30.7
%


Japan Earthquake
18.2
%


US - California Earthquake
15.5
%


US - Gulf Hurricane
9.9
%


US - Northeast Hurricane
9.2
%


UK & Ireland Windstorm
9.1
%


US - MidAtlantic Hurricane
7.0
%


Japan Windstorm
6.4
%


All other territory / region / peril zones
< 5.0%



1 Value at Risk ("VaR") represents the 99.0 percentile or the 1 in 100 year event for windstorm perils and the 99.6 percentile or the 1 in 250 year event for earthquake perils.
About Blue Capital
Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd., through its operating subsidiaries, offers collateralized reinsurance in the property catastrophe market, leveraging underwriting expertise and infrastructure from established resources. Underwriting decisions, operations and other management services are provided to Blue Capital by Blue Capital Management Ltd., a subsidiary of Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd. (a wholly owned subsidiary of Sompo Holdings, Inc.), a recognized global specialty provider of property and casualty insurance and reinsurance and a leading property catastrophe and short tail reinsurer since 2001. Additional information can be found in Blue Capital's public filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission or at www.bcapre.bm.
Safe Harbor for Forward-Looking Statements
Some of the statements in this press release may include, and Blue Capital may make related oral forward-looking statements which reflect our current views with respect to future events and financial performance. Such statements may include forward-looking statements both with respect to us in general and the insurance and reinsurance sectors specifically, both as to underwriting and investment matters. Statements that include the words "should," "would," "expect," "estimates", "intend," "plan," "believe," "project," "target," "anticipate," "seek," "will," "deliver," and similar statements of a future or forward-looking nature identify forward-looking statements in this press release for purposes of the U.S. federal securities laws or otherwise. We intend these forward-looking statements to be covered by the safe harbor provisions for forward-looking statements in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.
All forward-looking statements address matters that involve risks and uncertainties. Accordingly, there are or may be important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those indicated in the forward-looking statements. These factors include, but are not limited to, the effects of competitors' pricing policies, greater frequency or severity of claims and loss activity, changes in market conditions, decreased demand for property and casualty reinsurance, changes in the availability, cost or quality of reinsurance or retrocessional coverage, our inability to renew business previously underwritten or acquired, uncertainties in our reserving process, changes to our tax status, reduced acceptance of our existing or new products and services, a loss of business from and credit risk related to our broker counterparties, assessments for high risk or otherwise uninsured individuals, possible terrorism or the outbreak of war, a loss of key personnel, political conditions, changes in insurance regulation, operational risk, including the risk of fraud and errors and omissions, as well as technology breaches or failure, changes in accounting policies, our investment performance, the valuation of our invested assets, a breach of our investment guidelines, potential treatment of us as an investment company or a passive foreign investment company for purposes of U.S. securities laws or U.S. federal taxation, respectively, our dependence as a holding company upon dividends or distributions from our operating subsidiaries, the unavailability of capital in the future, developments in the world's financial and capital markets and our access to such markets, government intervention in the insurance and reinsurance industry, illiquidity in the credit markets, changes in general economic conditions and other factors described in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016.
The foregoing review of important factors should not be construed as exhaustive and should be read in conjunction with the other cautionary statements that are included herein and elsewhere, including the risk factors included in Blue Capital's most recent report on Form 10-K and other documents of Blue Capital on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Any forward-looking statements made in this material are qualified by these cautionary statements, and there can be no assurance that the actual results or developments anticipated by Blue Capital will be realized or, even if substantially realized, that they will have the expected consequences to, or effects on, Blue Capital or its business or operations. Except as required by law, Blue Capital undertakes no obligation to update publicly or revise any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future developments or otherwise.
The contents of any website referenced in this press release are not incorporated by reference herein. 
Contacts
Investor Relations
Phone: +1 441 278 0988
Email: investorrelations@Sompo-Intl.com


Source: Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings





                
  		            This article appears in: 
                    
                            News Headlines




                
                    Referenced Stocks: 
                    
                            BCRH




Latest News Video









Login




Please enable JavaScript to view the Comments powered by RealTidbits







Related stocks Articles




Subscribe







Why Oil Is at a 6-Week High


						7/26/2017 10:25 PM
					



CSX Rail Down 5% on Shocking Conference Call


						7/26/2017 10:15 PM
					



More OPEC Members Are Slacking on Their Cuts


						7/26/2017 10:10 PM
					












CLOSEX


Sign-in



















                        Existing NASDAQ.com member? Log in here.  
                    


                By signing into to the site using any of the third-party services above, you agree to NASDAQ.com's Terms of Use.
                


                Welcome back: 

                Log in using your: 
                
                 Account
                
Switch Accounts


















Highest Rated Articles of Last Week



Shareholders Approve Major Structural Change to Top Performing...
Merck and Pfizer Collaborate with Corning to Modernize ...
Yatra Attains Leadership Position in Corporate Travel With the...
Miller Heiman Group Selects CallidusCloud Datahug for Pipeline...
Tractor Supply Company Reports Second Quarter Results





View All Highest Rated




















Today's Market Activity





NASDAQ

6422.75


10.58
 ▲ 
0.16%





DJIA

21711.01


97.58
 ▲ 
0.45%





S&P 500

2477.83


0.70
 ▲ 
0.03%










Data as of Jul 26, 2017


Try for Free: NASDAQ LiveQuotes Platform



View All
















Upcoming Earnings



Company
Expected Report Date




AAPL
Jul 25, 2017


ODFL
Jul 27, 2017


FB
Jul 26, 2017


TSLA
Aug 2, 2017


T
Jul 20, 2017


AMZN
Jul 27, 2017


VZ
Jul 27, 2017


GE
Jul 21, 2017





Earnings Calendar





























CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX






































  BCRH:New York Stock Quote - Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd   BCRH:US   New York        19.00USD   0.20   1.04%     As of 8:04 PM EDT 7/26/2017     Open   19.15    Day Range   19.00 - 19.50    Volume   17,338    Previous Close   19.20    52Wk Range   16.73 - 20.24    1 Yr Return   14.33%                   


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Open   19.15    Day Range   19.00 - 19.50    Volume   17,338    Previous Close   19.20    52Wk Range   16.73 - 20.24    1 Yr Return   14.33%    YTD Return   6.02%    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   11.22    Earnings per Share (USD) (TTM)   1.69    Market Cap (m USD)   166.365    Shares Outstanding  (m)   8.756    Price/Sales (TTM)   3.95    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   6.32%        Sector Financials   % Price Change -0.61%     Industry Insurance   % Price Change -1.11%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.     6/15/2017   Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Announces Successful June 1 Renewals     6/12/2017   Blue Capital Declares Quarterly Dividend on Common Shares and Will Release Its Second Quarter 2017 Results on July 31, 2017     5/1/2017   Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports First Quarter 2017 Financial Results     3/13/2017   Blue Capital Declares Quarterly Dividend on Common Shares and Will Release Its First Quarter 2017 Results on May 1, 2017    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. operates as a holding company. The Company, through its subsidiaries, offers collateralized reinsurance and underwriting services to the property catastrophe market. Blue Capital Reinsurance serves customers in Bermuda.    Address  Waterloo House100 Pitts Bay RoadPembroke, HM 08Bermuda   Phone  1-441-278-0400   Website   ir-bcrh.bluecapital.bm     Executives Board Members    Michael J McGuire  Chairman/CEO    Greg A Garside  Chief Financial Officer      Laura Newhook   Mgr:Marketing & IR    Will Haddrell  Portfolio Manager     Show More         








Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd - NYSE:BCRH - Stock Quote & News - TheStreet






















 





















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street













































 






















Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd (BCRH)
Follow




                                    19.00
                                

0.20
1.04




                        NYSE : Financial
                    

Jul 26, 2017 4:04 PM EDT












Prev Close
  19.20


Open
19.15


Day Low/High

                                    19.00 /
                                    19.50


52 Wk Low/High

                                    17.22 /
                                    20.83
                                


Volume
17.34K


Avg Volume 
19.40K











Exchange
NYSE


Shares Outstanding
8.76M


Market Cap
165.93M


EPS
1.60


P/E Ratio

                                        
                                            12.39
                                        
                                    


Div & Yield

                                        
                                            1.20
                                            (6.30%)

                                        
                                    























Trade with Jim Cramer 14 Days FREE 









Latest News




BCRH Crosses Above Average Analyst Target






Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings About To Put More Money In Your Pocket (BCRH)













Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reaches Analyst Target Price
In recent trading, shares of Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd have crossed above the average analyst 12-month target price of $19.33, changing hands for $19.35/share. When a stock reaches the target an analyst has set, the analyst logically has two ways to react: downgrade on valuation, or, re-adjust their target price to a higher level.

Jun 19, 2017 9:33 AM EDT









Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Announces Successful June 1 Renewals


Jun 15, 2017 4:15 PM EDT









Blue Capital Declares Quarterly Dividend On Common Shares And Will Release Its Second Quarter 2017 Results On July 31, 2017


Jun 12, 2017 4:15 PM EDT









Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports First Quarter 2017 Financial Results


May 1, 2017 4:10 PM EDT









Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reaches Analyst Target Price
In recent trading, shares of Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd have crossed above the average analyst 12-month target price of $19.33, changing hands for $19.70/share. When a stock reaches the target an analyst has set, the analyst logically has two ways to react: downgrade on valuation, or, re-adjust their target price to a higher level.

Apr 21, 2017 9:14 AM EDT









Cash Dividend On The Way From Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings (BCRH)
Looking at the universe of stocks we cover at Dividend Channel, on 3/29/17, Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd will trade ex-dividend, for its quarterly dividend of $0.30, payable on 4/13/17. As a percentage of BCRH's recent stock price of $18.69, this dividend works out to approximately 1.61%, so look for shares of Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd to trade 1.61% lower — all else being equal — when BCRH shares open for trading on 3/29/17.

Mar 27, 2017 11:40 AM EDT









BCRH Crosses Above Average Analyst Target
In recent trading, shares of Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd have crossed above the average analyst 12-month target price of $19.33, changing hands for $19.45/share. When a stock reaches the target an analyst has set, the analyst logically has two ways to react: downgrade on valuation, or, re-adjust their target price to a higher level.

Mar 16, 2017 9:11 AM EDT









Blue Capital Declares Quarterly Dividend On Common Shares And Will Release Its First Quarter 2017 Results On May 1, 2017


Mar 13, 2017 4:15 PM EDT













Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reaches Analyst Target Price
In recent trading, shares of Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd have crossed above the average analyst 12-month target price of $19.33, changing hands for $19.35/share. When a stock reaches the target an analyst has set, the analyst logically has two ways to react: downgrade on valuation, or, re-adjust their target price to a higher level.

Jan 26, 2017 9:51 AM EST









Ratings Changes Today
TheStreet Quant Ratings provides fair and objective information to help you make educated investing decisions.  We rate over 4,300 stocks daily and provide 5-page PDF reports for each stock.  These ratings can change daily and today's changes are reflected in the email below.  

If you are looking to check-up on the stocks you currently own or are looking for new ideas, you can find our full database of password-protected ratings reports in our proprietary ratings screener:  
http://www.thestreet.com/k/qr/flat/stock-screener.html    
    
Upgrades:   BCRH, BGFV, CHTR, CTS, HLT, HZO, JRVR, MOMO, NYRT, PERY, VLP
    
Downgrades:   DL, MLNX, SGMA, SPKE, TARO, VLRS
    
Initiations:  AAAP, EQBK, VYGR
    
Read on to get TheStreet Quant Ratings' detailed report:

Dec 13, 2016 2:33 PM EST









Ratings Changes Today
TheStreet Quant Ratings provides fair and objective information to help you make educated investing decisions.  We rate over 4,300 stocks daily and provide 5-page PDF reports for each stock.  These ratings can change daily and today's changes are reflected in the email below.  

If you are looking to check-up on the stocks you currently own or are looking for new ideas, you can find our full database of password-protected ratings reports in our proprietary ratings screener:  
http://www.thestreet.com/k/qr/flat/stock-screener.html    
    
Upgrades:  ATU, BOBE, CCOI, GPL, GRC, HVT, HVT.A, MC, SBBX, SCM, SMTX, STN, TRC, X
    
Downgrades:  BCRH, OHI
    
Initiations:  CBIO
    
Read on to get TheStreet Quant Ratings' detailed report:

Nov 28, 2016 11:00 AM EST









Ratings Changes Today
TheStreet Quant Ratings provides fair and objective information to help you make educated investing decisions.  We rate over 4,300 stocks daily and provide 5-page PDF reports for each stock.  These ratings can change daily and today's changes are reflected in the email below.  

If you are looking to check-up on the stocks you currently own or are looking for new ideas, you can find our full database of password-protected ratings reports in our proprietary ratings screener:  
http://www.thestreet.com/k/qr/flat/stock-screener.html    
    
Upgrades:  BCRH, LPX, MDR, TR
    
Downgrades:  ACM, BOXC, COMM, CYOU, KFS, NAT, OSBC, OSN, SMMF, WIRE, WMIH 
    
Initiations:  None
    
Read on to get TheStreet Quant Ratings' detailed report:

Oct 25, 2016 11:00 AM EDT













Cash Dividend On The Way From Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings (BCRH)
Looking at the universe of stocks we cover at Dividend Channel, on 9/28/16, Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd will trade ex-dividend, for its quarterly dividend of $0.30, payable on 10/14/16. As a percentage of BCRH's recent stock price of $18.19, this dividend works out to approximately 1.65%, so look for shares of Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd to trade 1.65% lower — all else being equal — when BCRH shares open for trading on 9/28/16.

Sep 26, 2016 11:40 AM EDT









Ratings Changes Today
TheStreet Quant Ratings provides fair and objective information to help you make educated investing decisions.  We rate over 4,300 stocks daily and provide 5-page PDF reports for each stock.  These ratings can change daily and today's changes are reflected in the email below.  

If you are looking to check-up on the stocks you currently own or are looking for new ideas, you can find our full database of password-protected ratings reports in our proprietary ratings screener:  
http://www.thestreet.com/k/qr/flat/stock-screener.html    
    
Upgrades:  AOSL, ARES, BREW, CHTR, FSIC, GBDC, IPAR, LUK, LUNA, NRCIA, ODP, OLED, PIP, STRL, VIPS
    
Downgrades:  BCRH, CBNK, DF, HALL, MDVN, MYGN, NMR, NYRT, SGU, TCRD, TEO
    
Initiations:  APPF, GLPI, SPNE, TDOC
    
Read on to get TheStreet Quant Ratings' detailed report:

Aug 11, 2016 11:00 AM EDT













This Stock Has A 6.50% Yield, Sells For Less Than Book, and Insiders Have Been Buying
In this series, we look through the most recent Dividend Channel ''DividendRank'' report, and then we cherry pick only those companies that have experienced insider buying within the past six months. The officers and directors of a company tend to have a unique insider's view of the business, and presumably the only reason an insider would choose to take their hard-earned cash and use it to buy stock in the open market, is that they expect to make money — maybe they find the stock very undervalued, or maybe they see exciting progress within the company, or maybe both.

Jul 14, 2016 10:59 AM EDT









Ratings Changes Today
TheStreet Quant Ratings provides fair and objective information to help you make educated investing decisions.  We rate over 4,300 stocks daily and provide 5-page PDF reports for each stock.  These ratings can change daily and today's changes are reflected in the email below.  

If you are looking to check-up on the stocks you currently own or are looking for new ideas, you can find our full database of password-protected ratings reports in our proprietary ratings screener:  
http://www.thestreet.com/k/qr/flat/stock-screener.html    
    
Upgrades:  AGI, BCRH, BVN, CASS, CORR, MBLY, SBS
    
Downgrades:  AMCX, CMCT, IVZ, KFY, NRF, PFSW, WERN
    
Initiations:  None
    
Read on to get TheStreet Quant Ratings' detailed report:

Jun 30, 2016 11:00 AM EDT













Ex-Dividends To Watch: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tomorrow: BCRH, MORE, WPC
BCRH MORE WPC are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Tuesday, June 28, 2016

Jun 27, 2016 10:00 AM EDT









Ratings Changes Today
TheStreet Quant Ratings provides fair and objective information to help you make educated investing decisions.  We rate over 4,300 stocks daily and provide 5-page PDF reports for each stock.  These ratings can change daily and today's changes are reflected in the email below.  

If you are looking to check-up on the stocks you currently own or are looking for new ideas, you can find our full database of password-protected ratings reports in our proprietary ratings screener:  
http://www.thestreet.com/k/qr/flat/stock-screener.html    
    
Upgrades:  AES, CYBR, GAIN, MGRC
    
Downgrades:  ALN, BCOM, BCRH, CBT, DEST, ELLO, GTWN, MAS, REV, SHO, SSI, ZLTQ
    
Initiations:  NXRT
    
Read on to get TheStreet Quant Ratings' detailed report:

Jun 13, 2016 11:00 AM EDT









Ratings Changes Today
TheStreet Quant Ratings provides fair and objective information to help you make educated investing decisions.  We rate over 4,300 stocks daily and provide 5-page PDF reports for each stock.  These ratings can change daily and today's changes are reflected in the email below.  

If you are looking to check-up on the stocks you currently own or are looking for new ideas, you can find our full database of password-protected ratings reports in our proprietary ratings screener:  
http://www.thestreet.com/k/qr/flat/stock-screener.html    
    
Upgrades:  AHH, ARCC, ATU, BCRH, BFS, CFNB, FCE.A, FCE.B, FINL, HLF, LSCC, Q, RBC, SLRC, SNHY, WD
    
Downgrades:  BH, IVR, MTRN, PMC, TREE, TUP
    
Initiations:  EGRX, SEDG
    
Read on to get TheStreet Quant Ratings' detailed report:

May 10, 2016 11:09 AM EDT









Ratings Changes Today
TheStreet Quant Ratings provides fair and objective information to help you make educated investing decisions.  We rate over 4,300 stocks daily and provide 5-page PDF reports for each stock.  These ratings can change daily and today's changes are reflected in the email below.  

If you are looking to check-up on the stocks you currently own or are looking for new ideas, you can find our full database of password-protected ratings reports in our proprietary ratings screener:  
http://www.thestreet.com/k/qr/flat/stock-screener.html    
    
Upgrades:  AMPH, CNS, FTD, HCAP, HQCL, LOCK, NE, OSUR, PB, TUP
    
Downgrades:  BCRH
    
Initiations:  None
    
Read on to get TheStreet Quant Ratings' detailed report:

Apr 15, 2016 11:00 AM EDT













This Stock Has A 6.77% Yield And Sells For Less Than Book
Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd has been named as a Top 25 dividend stock, according the most recent Dividend Channel ''DividendRank'' report. The report noted that among the coverage universe, BCRH shares displayed both attractive valuation metrics and strong profitability metrics.

Apr 14, 2016 8:20 AM EDT













Cash Dividend On The Way From Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings (BCRH)
Looking at the universe of stocks we cover at Dividend Channel, on 3/29/16, Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd will trade ex-dividend, for its quarterly dividend of $0.30, payable on 4/15/16. As a percentage of BCRH's recent stock price of $17.94, this dividend works out to approximately 1.67%, so look for shares of Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd to trade 1.67% lower — all else being equal — when BCRH shares open for trading on 3/29/16.

Mar 28, 2016 11:16 AM EDT













Ex-Dividends To Watch: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tuesday: BCRH, KW, COR
BCRH KW COR are going ex-dividend Tuesday, Tuesday, March 29, 2016

Mar 28, 2016 10:00 AM EDT













Ex-Dividend Alert: 3 Stocks Going Ex-Dividend Tomorrow: BCRH, BOBE, CMP
BCRH BOBE CMP are going ex-dividend tomorrow, Thursday, February 25, 2016

Feb 24, 2016 10:00 AM EST









Ratings Changes Today
TheStreet Quant Ratings provides fair and objective information to help you make educated investing decisions.  We rate over 4,300 stocks daily and provide 5-page PDF reports for each stock.  These ratings can change daily and today's changes are reflected in the email below.  

If you are looking to check-up on the stocks you currently own or are looking for new ideas, you can find our full database of password-protected ratings reports in our proprietary ratings screener:  
http://www.thestreet.com/k/qr/flat/stock-screener.html    
    
Upgrades:  BCRH, ENTA, GOLD
    
Downgrades:  ACAT, ALSN, AVX, BIO.B, CCMP, CMA, CNA, DGII, DO, IHS, JD, JOBS, LPTH, PACD, PHX, RNET, VASC, YELP
    
Initiations:  NEWR
    
Read on to get TheStreet Quant Ratings' detailed report:

Feb 9, 2016 11:00 AM EST













What To Hold: 3 Hold-Rated Dividend Stocks USAC, SSW, BCRH
These 3 dividend stocks are rated a Hold by TheStreet

Oct 1, 2015 11:30 AM EDT













3 Stocks With Upcoming Ex-Dividend Dates: BCRH, ANH, NHI
BCRH ANH NHI are going ex-dividend Monday, Monday, September 28, 2015

Sep 25, 2015 10:01 AM EDT













Reminder - Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings (BCRH) Goes Ex-Dividend Soon
Looking at the universe of stocks we cover at Dividend Channel, on 9/28/15, Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd will trade ex-dividend, for its quarterly dividend of $0.30, payable on 10/15/15. As a percentage of BCRH's recent stock price of $17.29, this dividend works out to approximately 1.74%, so look for shares of Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd to trade 1.74% lower — all else being equal — when BCRH shares open for trading on 9/28/15.

Sep 24, 2015 10:58 AM EDT



















Next






Load More









Quant Rating on 4:04 PM EDT 7/26/2017


B+
(Buy)






Get the (BCRH) Report Here 







From Our Partners



Blue Capital Reinsurance declares $0.30 dividend

SeekingAlpha



Blue Capital Reinsurance misses by $0.06, misses on revenue

SeekingAlpha



Searching For Value

SeekingAlpha



You Must Be Crazy! - A Leveraged Portfolio

SeekingAlpha



Blue Capital Reinsurance declares $0.30 dividend

SeekingAlpha



Top Ranked Income Stocks to Buy for February 14th

Zacks



New Strong Buy Stocks for February 14th

Zacks



Top Ranked Income Stocks to Buy for February 6th

Zacks



Blue Capital Reinsurance declares $0.59 dividend

SeekingAlpha



Blue Capital Reinsurance beats by $0.22, beats on revenue

SeekingAlpha



Year 3 Review - You Must Be Crazy!

SeekingAlpha



Avoid High-Yield Dividend Traps

SeekingAlpha



Financials - Top 5 Gainers / Losers as of 1:00 PM

SeekingAlpha



Blue Capital downgraded to Sell from Buy at UBS

The Fly



Blue Capital Reinsurance beats by $0.02, beats on net premiums earned

SeekingAlpha



























TheStreet
Quant Rating:

B+ (Buy)



Get the (BCRH) Report Here 













 











Trending


If Donald Trump Is Right, How Many Jobs Would 3 Apple Factories in the U.S. Really Create?


Apple's iPhone 8 Is Coming, and It Could Be in Your Hands Very Soon


Jim Cramer Reveals Why He's Pleased With Advanced Micro Devices and Boeing's Earnings


Facebook Blows the Minds of Investors Yet Again With How Much Money It's Making


What Could President Trump Actually Do to Amazon and Jeff Bezos?











Advertising Partners



 






 






 






 


























 

























 







































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 













Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd (BCRH.N)  Company Profile | Reuters.com


























































X



Edition:

United States


















Africa
América Latina


عربي
Argentina


Brasil
Canada


中国
Deutschland


España
France


India
Italia


日本
México


РОССИЯ
United Kingdom

United States
















Profile: Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd (BCRH.N)





Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerFinancialsReinsurance












                
                        Overview
                    



                
                        News
                    



                
                        Key Developments
                    



                
                        People
                    



                
                        Charts
                    



                
                        Financials
                    



                
                        Analysts
                    



                    
                            Research
                        



                    
                            Pulse
                        










				BCRH.N on New York Stock Exchange


				19.15USD
12:19pm EDT





				    Change	(% chg)


		    
						    $-0.05


					            (-0.26%)
					        






Prev Close

$19.20


Open

$19.15




Day's High

$19.50


Day's Low

$19.15




Volume

2,065


Avg. Vol

5,464




52-wk High

$20.75


52-wk Low

$17.23












					Full Description



Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd., incorporated on June 24, 2013, provides collateralized reinsurance in the property catastrophe market and invests in various insurance-linked securities. The Company conducts its operations through its subsidiaries, including Blue Capital Re Ltd. (Blue Capital Re), which provides collateralized reinsurance, and Blue Capital Re ILS Ltd. (Blue Capital Re ILS), which conducts hedging and other investment activities.Blue Capital Re provides reinsurance to third-party insurance and reinsurance companies through reinsurance contracts, either directly with the cedant or on a fronted basis. Blue Capital Re ILS may purchase catastrophe bonds to access certain risks. Blue Capital Re or Blue Capital Re ILS may buy and sell industry loss warranties as a way to access certain risks. Blue Capital Re ILS' portfolio may include over-the-counter or exchange-traded futures or options listed on catastrophe indexes, such as catastrophe or weather derivatives.The Company competes with Aeolus Capital Management, Markel CatCo Investment Management, Credit Suisse Asset Management, Leadenhall Capital, Lloyd's of London, Nephila Capital Ltd., Pillar Capital, RenaissanceRe Holdings Ltd. and Validus Holdings, Ltd.

» Full Overview of BCRH.N







					Company Address



Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd
94 Pitts Bay RoadPEMBROKE      HM 08
P: +1441.2997595







					Company Web Links



Home Page








					Officers & Directors






Name
Compensation




							 Michael McGuire

--




							 Greg Garside

--




							 Eric Lemieux

--




							 D Cook

--




							 John Weale

--




» More Officers & Directors





					Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd News




BRIEF-Blue Capital Reinsurance Q1 operating earnings $0.47/shr

May 01 2017 
BRIEF-Adam Szakmary advised Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd of his resignation as CEO

Apr 25 2017 
BRIEF-Lifebrandz updates on sale and purchase of shares in company

Apr 18 2017 
BRIEF-Donald Smith & Co Inc reports 6.06 percent passive stake in Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd as of December 31, 2016 - SEC filing

Feb 09 2017 
BRIEF-Aberdeen Asset Management reports 5.3 pct passive stake in Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd as of Dec 30 - SEC filing

Feb 07 2017 


» More BCRH.N  News
















Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerFinancialsReinsurance
























Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Announces Successful June 1 Renewals NYSE:BCRH








































































English
Français











Register
Sign In












Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Announces Successful June 1 Renewals




















June 15, 2017 16:15 ET

 | Source: Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings






HAMILTON, Bermuda, June  15, 2017  (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. (NYSE:BCRH) ("Blue Capital"), a Bermuda holding company that, through its operating subsidiaries, offers collateralized reinsurance in the property catastrophe market and invests in various insurance-linked securities, today provided a portfolio update. Mike McGuire, Chairman and CEO of Blue Capital, commented: “We are pleased to report strong portfolio execution during the June renewal period.  Overall market price reductions were larger than initially anticipated, with the Florida market being 5% - 7.5% down year on year.  However, due to the strength of our established long term relationships, the high quality of our underwriting and portfolio management teams and our strategic alignment with Sompo International, we were able to construct an attractive portfolio with risk adjusted pricing down 3%.”  As of June 1, 2017 the Company bound indemnity reinsurance contracts with expected total annual premiums of $4.7 million, an increase of $2.0 million when compared to the same period in 2016. The business underwritten by the Company is expected to produce a net rate on line for the portfolio of 17.7%, which is an increase of 170 basis points when compared to the same period in 2016. The higher rate on line is a result of increased deployment in the June renewal period, which was primarily focused on Florida exposed accounts that have a higher rate on line than the portfolio average. The Company’s in-force portfolio deployed as of June 1, 2017 consisted of approximately 30.2% in support of first event reinsurance coverages, 46.2% in support of catastrophe quota share coverages and the balance in support of second and subsequent event coverages. A breakdown of the current portfolio is set out below: Portfolio Summary The following unaudited tables provide a breakdown of the of the Company’s portfolio by contract type, zone and peril (as at 1 June 2017). Exposure is defined as deployed collateral plus net premium minus ultimate losses. Contract TypeExposure(US $millions) Exposure as a% of CurrentPortfolio PositionsHeldProperty Catastrophe Total143.0 89.8% 83  Prop Cat – First Event XOL121.9 76.6% 67  Prop Cat – Subsequent Event XOL11.5 7.2% 10  Prop Cat – Aggregate XOL9.6 6.0% 6Industry Loss Warranty Total13.2 8.3% 4  ILW - Subsequent Event XOL 13.2 8.3% 4  ILW - First Event XOL 0.0 0.0% 0  ILW - Aggregate XOL0.0 0.0% 0Cat Bond Total0 0.0% 0Retrocessional Hedging Total3.0 1.9% 3Current Portfolio159.2 100% 90 XOL = excess of loss               ILW = Industry Loss Warranty                        Asset ClassInvestment(US$millions) Investment asa % of CurrentPortfolio PositionsHeldTraditional143.0 89.8% 83  Quota Share Retrocessional73.7 46.3% 21  Indemnity Retrocession37.9 23.8% 15  Indemnity Reinsurance31.4 19.7% 66Non-Traditional13.2 8.3% 4  Industry Loss Warranties 13.2 8.3% 4  Other non-property catastrophe risk2 0.0 0.0% 0  Cat Bonds0.0 0.0% 0Retrocessional Hedging3.0 1.9% 3Current Portfolio159.2 100% 90 1 Underlying positions held within the quota share retrocessional agreements totals 1,500.2 Contracts transacted in an International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc. contract format. Portfolio Return Summary1 Illustrative Net Aggregate ReturnDistribution2017 PortfolioReturns   No Loss Return15%  Expected Return Range26 – 11%Probability of:   Mean or Greater Return72%  Breakeven or Greater83%  Loss to NAV Greater than 5% 12%  Loss to NAV Greater than 10%9%  Loss to NAV Greater than 15%6%  Loss to NAV Greater than 25%3%  Loss to NAV Greater than 35%2% 1 The portfolio return summary is provided for illustrative purposes only. The projections are derived by reference to the Company's modelled portfolio as at 1 June 2017 and do not take into account actual costs, expenses or other factors which are not attributable to the portfolio. As such, the in force portfolio return summary should not in any way be construed as forecasting the Company’s actual returns should no losses occur or otherwise. 2 Net aggregate return distribution between a mean and median catastrophe year. Probable Maximum Loss The exposures summarised below represent the sum of all collateral invested less reinsurance recoverable. Per the Company’s Investment Policy, the net first event Probable Maximum Loss (“PML”) in any one zone will not exceed 35% of the Company’s Shareholder’s Equity (at the time the investment is made). For contracts that overlap zones, the total exposure is counted in each of the exposed zones. Territory / Region / PerilFirst EventVaR1 as a %of NAVUS – Florida Hurricane30.7%Japan Earthquake18.2%US – California Earthquake15.5%US – Gulf Hurricane9.9%US – Northeast Hurricane9.2%UK & Ireland Windstorm9.1%US – MidAtlantic Hurricane7.0%Japan Windstorm6.4%All other territory / region / peril zones< 5.0% 1 Value at Risk (“VaR”) represents the 99.0 percentile or the 1 in 100 year event for windstorm perils and the 99.6 percentile or the 1 in 250 year event for earthquake perils. About Blue Capital Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd., through its operating subsidiaries, offers collateralized reinsurance in the property catastrophe market, leveraging underwriting expertise and infrastructure from established resources. Underwriting decisions, operations and other management services are provided to Blue Capital by Blue Capital Management Ltd., a subsidiary of Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd. (a wholly owned subsidiary of Sompo Holdings, Inc.), a recognized global specialty provider of property and casualty insurance and reinsurance and a leading property catastrophe and short tail reinsurer since 2001. Additional information can be found in Blue Capital's public filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission or at www.bcapre.bm. Safe Harbor for Forward-Looking Statements Some of the statements in this press release may include, and Blue Capital may make related oral forward-looking statements which reflect our current views with respect to future events and financial performance. Such statements may include forward-looking statements both with respect to us in general and the insurance and reinsurance sectors specifically, both as to underwriting and investment matters. Statements that include the words "should," "would," "expect," "estimates", "intend," "plan," "believe," "project," "target," "anticipate," "seek," "will," "deliver," and similar statements of a future or forward-looking nature identify forward-looking statements in this press release for purposes of the U.S. federal securities laws or otherwise. We intend these forward-looking statements to be covered by the safe harbor provisions for forward-looking statements in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. All forward-looking statements address matters that involve risks and uncertainties. Accordingly, there are or may be important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those indicated in the forward-looking statements. These factors include, but are not limited to, the effects of competitors’ pricing policies, greater frequency or severity of claims and loss activity, changes in market conditions, decreased demand for property and casualty reinsurance, changes in the availability, cost or quality of reinsurance or retrocessional coverage, our inability to renew business previously underwritten or acquired, uncertainties in our reserving process, changes to our tax status, reduced acceptance of our existing or new products and services, a loss of business from and credit risk related to our broker counterparties, assessments for high risk or otherwise uninsured individuals, possible terrorism or the outbreak of war, a loss of key personnel, political conditions, changes in insurance regulation, operational risk, including the risk of fraud and errors and omissions, as well as technology breaches or failure, changes in accounting policies, our investment performance, the valuation of our invested assets, a breach of our investment guidelines, potential treatment of us as an investment company or a passive foreign investment company for purposes of U.S. securities laws or U.S. federal taxation, respectively, our dependence as a holding company upon dividends or distributions from our operating subsidiaries, the unavailability of capital in the future, developments in the world’s financial and capital markets and our access to such markets, government intervention in the insurance and reinsurance industry, illiquidity in the credit markets, changes in general economic conditions and other factors described in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016. The foregoing review of important factors should not be construed as exhaustive and should be read in conjunction with the other cautionary statements that are included herein and elsewhere, including the risk factors included in Blue Capital’s most recent report on Form 10-K and other documents of Blue Capital on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Any forward-looking statements made in this material are qualified by these cautionary statements, and there can be no assurance that the actual results or developments anticipated by Blue Capital will be realized or, even if substantially realized, that they will have the expected consequences to, or effects on, Blue Capital or its business or operations. Except as required by law, Blue Capital undertakes no obligation to update publicly or revise any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future developments or otherwise. The contents of any website referenced in this press release are not incorporated by reference herein.  Contacts
Investor Relations
Phone: +1 441 278 0988
Email: investorrelations@Sompo-Intl.com


Related Articles
other press releases by Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings


Blue Capital Declares Quarterly Dividend on Common Shares and Will Release Its Second Quarter 2017 Results on July 31, 2017
June 12, 2017 16:15


Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports First Quarter 2017 Financial Results
May 01, 2017 16:10


Blue Capital Declares Quarterly Dividend on Common Shares and Will Release Its First Quarter 2017 Results on May 1, 2017
March 13, 2017 16:15








Profile

Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings





  Subscribe via RSS
 Subscribe via ATOM
 Javascript



  Pembroke,  BERMUDA
  http://www.bluecapital.bm




Contact Data
Contacts
Investor Relations
Phone: +1 441 278 0988
Email: investorrelations@Sompo-Intl.com

Contact



With a Reader Account, it's easy to send email directly to the contact for this release. Sign up today for your free Reader Account!



Already have an account?  Log in here.





















Newswire Distribution Network & Management



Home
Newsroom
RSS Feeds
Legal
Contact Us






About Us
GlobeNewswire, a Nasdaq company, is one of the world's largest newswire distribution networks, specializing in the delivery of corporate press releases financial disclosures and multimedia content to the media, investment community, individual investors and the general public.
            




Contact Us


Corporate Headquarters
2321 Rosecrans Avenue.
Suite 2200
El Segundo, CA 90245
Phone: (800) 307-6627
Fax:  (800) 307-3567
            


European Headquarters
Woolgate Exchange,
25 Basinghall Street,
London EC2V 5HA
UK
Phone: +1 866-465-8454




© 2017 GlobeNewswire, Inc. All Rights Reserved.













Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. - BCRH - Stock Price Today - Zacks






























Quote Overview


Stock Activity



Open
19.15


Day Low
19.00


Day High
19.50


52 Wk Low
17.22


52 Wk High
20.83


Avg. Volume
23,643


Market Cap
168.12 M


Dividend
1.20 ( 6.25%)


Beta
0.08





Key Earnings Data



Earnings ESP 
0.00%


Most Accurate Est
0.50


Current Qtr Est
0.50


Current Yr Est
1.75


Exp Earnings Date
*AMC7/31/17


Prior Year EPS
1.63


Exp EPS Growth (3-5yr)NA


Forward PE
10.97


PEG Ratio
NA













Finance » Insurance - Brokerage



*BMO = Before Market Open *AMC = After Market Close


Zacks Earnings ESP (Expected Surprise Prediction) looks to find earnings surprises by focusing on the most recent analyst revisions. This is done because, generally speaking, if an analyst reevaluates their earnings estimate right before an earnings release, it means that they have fresh information which could potentially be more accurate than what analysts thought about a company two or three months ago.
The crux of this approach is comparing the Most Accurate Estimate to the Zacks Consensus Estimate, although the Zacks Rank is also an important feature of the ESP metric. Combining these two can help investors find stocks that are ready to beat the consensus at their next report, and hopefully surge higher in price too.
In fact, when combining a Zacks Rank #3 or better and a positive Earnings ESP, stocks produced a positive surprise 70% of the time. And best of all, by using these parameters, investors have seen 28.3% annual returns on average, according to our 10 year backtest.
Visit the Earnings ESP Center
See the Full List of Stocks To Beat Earnings





Research Report for BCRH



All Zacks’ Analyst Reports



Premium Research for BCRH





Zacks Rank


 Hold 3



Zacks Industry Rank
 Bottom 21%(210 out of 265)


Zacks Sector Rank
 Bottom 31% (11  out of 16) 



Style Scores

B Value | B Growth | A Momentum | A VGM




Earnings ESP


0.00%



Research Report for BCRH

Snapshot





This is our short term rating system that serves as a timeliness indicator for stocks over the next 1 to 3 months. How good is it? See rankings and related performance below. 



Zacks Rank
Definition
Annualized Return




1
Strong Buy
25.71%


2
Buy
18.12%


3
Hold
9.91%


4
Sell
5.49%


5
Strong Sell
2.29%


S&P
500
9.79%



Zacks Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Rank
Zacks Rank Home - All Zacks Rank resources in one place
Zacks Premium - The only way to get access to the Zacks Rank


The Style Scores  are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style.
The scores are based on the trading styles of Value, Growth, and Momentum. There's also a VGM Score ('V' for Value, 'G' for Growth and 'M' for Momentum), which combines the weighted average of the individual style scores into one score.



Value Score
A


Growth Score
A


Momentum Score
A


VGM Score
A



Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A, is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B in your personal trading style.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores


The Zacks Industry Rank assigns a rating to each of the 265 X (Expanded) Industries based on their average Zacks Rank.
An industry with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
The industry with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top industry (1 out of 265), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Industries. The industry with the worst average Zacks Rank (265 out of 265) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank  
Zacks Industry Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Industry Rank



The Zacks Sector Rank assigns a rating to each of the 16 Sectors based on their average Zacks Rank.
A sector with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
Zacks Sector Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank 
The sector with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top sector (1 out of 16), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Sectors. The sector with the worst average Zacks Rank (16 out of 16) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank 
Zacks Sector Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank



The Zacks Equity Research reports, or ZER for short, are our in-house, independently produced research reports.
The ever popular one-page Snapshot reports are generated for virtually every single Zacks Ranked stock. It's packed with all of the company's key stats and salient decision making information. Including the Zacks Rank, Zacks Industry Rank, Style Scores, the Price, Consensus & Surprise chart, graphical estimate analysis and how a stocks stacks up to its peers.
The detailed multi-page Analyst report does an even deeper dive on the company's vital statistics. In addition to all of the proprietary analysis in the Snapshot, the report also visually displays the four components of the Zacks Rank (Agreement, Magnitude, Upside and Surprise); provides a comprehensive overview of the company business drivers, complete with earnings and sales charts; a recap of their last earnings report; and a bulleted list of reasons to buy or sell the stock. It also includes an industry comparison table to see how your stock compares to its expanded industry, and the S&P 500.
Researching stocks has never been so easy or insightful as with the ZER Analyst and Snapshot reports.
Learn more about Zacks Equity Research reports
See more Zacks Equity Research reports


Zacks Earnings ESP (Expected Surprise Prediction) looks to find companies that have recently seen positive earnings estimate revision activity. The idea is that more recent information is, generally speaking, more accurate and can be a better predictor of the future, which can give investors an advantage in earnings season.
The technique has proven to be very useful for finding positive surprises. In fact, when combining a Zacks Rank #3 or better and a positive Earnings ESP, stocks produced a positive surprise 70% of the time, while they also saw 28.3% annual returns on average, according to our 10 year backtest.
    
Visit the Earnings ESP Center
See the Full List of Stocks To Beat Earnings


This is our short term rating system that serves as a timeliness indicator for stocks over the next 1 to 3 months. How good is it? See rankings and related performance below. 



Zacks Rank
Definition
Annualized Return




1
Strong Buy
25.71%


2
Buy
18.12%


3
Hold
9.91%


4
Sell
5.49%


5
Strong Sell
2.29%


S&P
500
9.79%



Zacks Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Rank
Zacks Rank Home - All Zacks Rank resources in one place
Zacks Premium - The only way to fully access the Zacks Rank


The Zacks Industry Rank assigns a rating to each of the 265 X (Expanded) Industries based on their average Zacks Rank.
An industry with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
The industry with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top industry (1 out of 265), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Industries. The industry with the worst average Zacks Rank (265 out of 265) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank  
Zacks Industry Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Industry Rank



The Zacks Sector Rank assigns a rating to each of the 16 Sectors based on their average Zacks Rank.
A sector with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
Zacks Sector Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank 
The sector with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top sector (1 out of 16), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Sectors. The sector with the worst average Zacks Rank (16 out of 16) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank 
Zacks Sector Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank



The Style Scores are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style. 
The three scores are based on the trading styles of Growth, Value, and Momentum.


Growth Score
A


Value Score
A


Momentum Score
A


Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores


The Style Scores  are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style.
The scores are based on the trading styles of Value, Growth, and Momentum. There's also a VGM Score ('V' for Value, 'G' for Growth and 'M' for Momentum), which combines the weighted average of the individual style scores into one score.



Value Score
A


Growth Score
A


Momentum Score
A


VGM Score
A



Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A, is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B in your personal trading style.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores


The Zacks Equity Research reports, or ZER for short, are our in-house, independently produced research reports.
The ever popular one-page Snapshot reports are generated for virtually every single Zacks Ranked stock. It's packed with all of the company's key stats and salient decision making information. Including the Zacks Rank, Zacks Industry Rank, Style Scores, the Price, Consensus & Surprise chart, graphical estimate analysis and how a stocks stacks up to its peers.
The detailed multi-page Analyst report does an even deeper dive on the company's vital statistics. In addition to all of the proprietary analysis in the Snapshot, the report also visually displays the four components of the Zacks Rank (Agreement, Magnitude, Upside and Surprise); provides a comprehensive overview of the company business drivers, complete with earnings and sales charts; a recap of their last earnings report; and a bulleted list of reasons to buy or sell the stock. It also includes an industry comparison table to see how your stock compares to its expanded industry, and the S&P 500.
Researching stocks has never been so easy or insightful as with the ZER Analyst and Snapshot reports.
Learn more about Zacks Equity Research reports
See more Zacks Equity Research reports

(  = Change in last 30 days) 
View All Zacks Rank #1 Strong Buys





Premium Research: Industry Analysis



Top Peers
Symbol
Zacks Rank




Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.
BCRH



Aon PLC
AON



Brown & Brown, Inc.
BRO



Erie Indemnity Company
ERIE



Hannover Ruck SE
HVRRY



Patriot National, Inc.
PN



Validus Holdings, Ltd.
VR




See all Insurance - Brokerage Peers


 




Zacks News for BCRH

Validus Holdings (VR) and its Units Receive Rating Action
04/06/17-9:07AM EST  Zacks

Aon (AON) to Divest Non-Core Operations to Blackstone
02/14/17-8:20AM EST  Zacks

BCRH: What are Zacks experts saying now?

Zacks Private Portfolio Services

Lincoln National Adds Fee-based Annuities to its Portfolio
02/14/17-7:51AM EST  Zacks

Top Ranked Income Stocks to Buy for February 14th
02/14/17-12:00AM EST  Zacks

New Strong Buy Stocks for February 14th
02/14/17-12:00AM EST  Zacks




Company Summary
Blue Capital Holdings Ltd. is a reinsurance holding company. It offers collateralized reinsurance in the property catastrophe market. Blue Capital Holdings Ltd. is based in Bermuda.   





 






Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














blue capital reinsurance holdings - Money A2Z - Web Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web



























Web





Images


Images










BCRH Stock Predictions | flashratings.com



Ad
 ·
flashratings.com



All Current Analyst Ratings and Price Targets for BCRH





About us



FlashRatings' Principles




Analyst Ranking



Privacy





Reinsurance industry news | ReinsuranceNe.ws



Ad
 ·
http:/​/​ReinsuranceNe.ws



The reinsurance news that matters, to your inbox, daily




Searches related toblue capital reinsurance holdings



blue capital bermuda


blue capital reinsurance dividend his...


blue capital management


insured capital holdings llc



blue point capital management


blue top capital


blue capital group


blue road capital partners




Web Results

Blue Capital Management | Blue Capital

www.bluecapital.bm


Blue Capital Management Ltd. ("Blue Capital") provides innovative catastrophe reinsurance-linked investment products for institutional and retail investors.



Management



Contacts



Products



Legal Information



Investor Center



BCRH Stock Price - Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd ...

www.marketwatch.com/investing/stock/BCRH


Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. stock price, stock quotes and financial overviews from MarketWatch.



Insiders



Charts



Financials



Analyst Estimates



SEC Filings



Profile



Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd - NYSE:BCRH - Stock ...

https://www.thestreet.com/quote/BCRH.html


View detailed financial information, real-time news, videos, quotes and analysis on Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd (NYSE:BCRH). Explore commentary on Blue ...


Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. - BCRH - Stock ...

https://www.zacks.com/stock/quote/BCRH


View Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. BCRH investment & stock information. Get the latest Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. BCRH detailed stock quotes ...


Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Announces ...

https://www.thestreet.com/story/14181824/1/blue-capital...


HAMILTON, Bermuda, June 15, 2017 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. (NYSE:BCRH) ("Blue Capital"), a Bermuda holding company that, through its ...


Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. Announces ...

www.nasdaq.com/press-release/blue-capital-reinsurance-holdings-ltd...


HAMILTON, Bermuda, June 15, 2017-- Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd., a Bermuda holding company that, through its operating subsidiaries,.


Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Reports Fourth Quarter ...

https://finance.yahoo.com/news/blue-capital-reinsurance-holdings...


PEMBROKE, Bermuda - February 1, 2017 - Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. (NYSE:BCRH) ("Blue Capital" or the "Company"), a Bermuda holding company that, through ...


BCRH:New York Stock Quote - Blue Capital Reinsurance ...

https://www.bloomberg.com/quote/BCRH:US


Stock analysis for Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd (BCRH:New York) including stock price, stock chart, company news, key statistics, fundamentals and company ...


Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd.: Private Company ...

www.bloomberg.com/research/stocks/private/snapshot.asp?privcapId=...


Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. company research & investing information. Find executives and the latest company news.


Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings (NYSE:BCRH) News & Analysis

https://www.marketbeat.com/stocks/NYSE/BCRH


View Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings' (NYSE:BCRH) latest stock price, price target, analyst ratings, earnings, dividends, headlines and insider trades in real-time.










BCRH Stock Predictions | flashratings.com



Ad
 ·
flashratings.com



All Current Analyst Ratings and Price Targets for BCRH





About us



FlashRatings' Principles




Analyst Ranking



Privacy





Reinsurance industry news | ReinsuranceNe.ws



Ad
 ·
http:/​/​ReinsuranceNe.ws



The reinsurance news that matters, to your inbox, daily



Searches related toblue capital reinsurance holdings



blue capital bermuda


blue capital reinsurance dividend his...


blue capital management


insured capital holdings llc



blue point capital management


blue top capital


blue capital group


blue road capital partners




12345Next















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network

















Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. (BCRH) - Stock Predictions & Price Targets














Facebook Autocomplete Demo









Post a Rating















              $
              



            12-Month Price Target
            



              $
              









140






 






















 




HOME
 TRENDING
SIGN UP
LOG IN


















      Blue Capital Reinsurance Holdings Ltd. (BCRH)
    




                Median target price: 
                                            $17
                  (7% downside)
          
            Positive ratings: 


                                           

                    0%
                  

                of 2 analysts


                    Latest:     UBS | sell | $17  | 
                                              11/23
                
              

View all analyst ratings  for BCRH  »
          





































Facebook Autocomplete Demo









Post a Rating















              $
              



            12-Month Price Target
            



              $
              









140






 






















 




HOME
 TRENDING
SIGN UP
LOG IN






















Analyst Ranking





 

                    Name
                  

                    Measured Ratings
                  

                    Sucess Rate
                  

                    Avg Return
                  





                      1.
                    
Mizuho
15


                        73%
                    


                        20.57
                          %
                      




                      2.
                    
Credit Suisse
16


                        75%
                    


                        10.49
                          %
                      




                      3.
                    
Jefferies
26


                        58%
                    


                        7.91
                          %
                      




                      4.
                    
Cantor Fitzgerald
11


                        82%
                    


                        8.50
                          %
                      




                      5.
                    
Bank of America Merrill Lynch
15


                        67%
                    


                        7.85
                          %
                      




                      6.
                    
JMP Securities
20


                        65%
                    


                        4.62
                          %
                      




                      7.
                    
Goldman Sachs
21


                        67%
                    


                        3.28
                          %
                      




                      8.
                    
Raymond James
13


                        77%
                    


                        2.89
                          %
                      




                      9.
                    
FBR Capital Markets
21


                        57%
                    


                        2.45
                          %
                      




                      10.
                    
William Blair
24


                        54%
                    


                        2.32
                          %
                      

























FlashRatings | Contact Us














Facebook Autocomplete Demo









Post a Rating















              $
              



            12-Month Price Target
            



              $
              









140






 






















 




 TRENDING
SIGN UP
LOG IN









Contact FlashRatings












Your emotional state
Excited
Confused
Worried
Upset
Panicked
Angry







 


























FlashRatings | Principles














Facebook Autocomplete Demo









Post a Rating















              $
              



            12-Month Price Target
            



              $
              









140






 






















 




 TRENDING
SIGN UP
LOG IN








FlashRatings' Principles

          1. FlashRatings' mission is to provide you - the investor - with as much honest and professional research on your investments as possible.
        

          2. We believe it's much better to get a multitude of credible opinions on an investment than to arbitrarily follow any single advisor - be it your banker, a friend, or a TV pundit.
        

          3. FlashRatings does NOT provide advice. Our job is to accurately and objectively report on analysts' credible research and opinions. The only advice FlashRatings will ever give you is to absorb as much fundamental research and different opinions as possible and make your own decisions!
         

          4. FlashRatings favors covering analysts with proven track records, but will cover all analysts as long as their research is honest and professional.
        



Sign up »





















FlashRatings | About us














Facebook Autocomplete Demo









Post a Rating















              $
              



            12-Month Price Target
            



              $
              









140






 






















 




 TRENDING
SIGN UP
LOG IN








FlashRatings - All research for my stocks!

The most comprehensive equity research coverage available online.


          Never miss a single piece of research, upgrade, downgrade or target price change by any analyst firm on any stock!
          
          Equity research by professional analysts - especially their rationales more than their forecasts - contains far more interesting and important information about the actual fundamentals of the traded companies than can be gathered from conventional news reports.
          
          Our mission is to unlock access to valuable research on stocks for all retail investors. 
          
          
         

      
          
        



Professionals/ Institutions: Take advantage of our cost-effective subscriptions to have FlashRatings's comprehensive real-time feed delivered into your intranet and trading floor platforms. (Institutional Subscriptions)


Websites: Become a content licensing partner and display FlashRatings's popular news feed on your website. (Content Licensing)


Advertisers: Advertise with us and have FlashRatings readers, with attractive demographics, take advantage of your products. (Advertising)














